Call or email today for more information
Anyways, this is the only blue dress I own and one of the few tube top dresses I have in my wardrobe. Everybody has a complex about his/her body, I believe. Right? I do. I have several, and one of them is the size of my chest. I’m a surfboard. For me to wear a tube top is a bit tricky, but I still do. Even though I have to keep pulling it up when I wear it! I added a white sweater to cover a little more of my skin to pay respect as I live in a Muslim country.
Somehow I think I'd rather have a doggie biscuit!
Boulevard Brewing Co. Pilsner
Brolinson, Per-Erik & Holger Larsen (1984) När rocken slog i Sverige. Svensk rockhistoria 1955-1965 (When rock hit Sweden. The history of Swedish rock 1955-65) Solna: Sweden Music.
I want to introduced the new reserved ink of my store.
America's Favorite Past Time: Baseball...It seems as though it would be un-American for your little boy of six to declare that he is 'done with baseball,' but that is what he did this past summer. I didn't know what to think..."You don't want to play baseball anymore?" "NO" was his response. I'll be honest...I wasn't exactly surprised. Alex's heart just never seemed in it. He loved to come to the plate to whack at the ball, but playing the outfield was just a form of hatred. Alex usually just stared at his feet, kicked the dirt, expected all balls to be hit directly towards him, and seemed surprised when they sailed by three feet to his left. Still, I felt that this lack of love for baseball may have been seeded in the fact that this has indeed been a rough summer. I didn't even want to sit as an observer during practices and games in the excessive heat and humidity...How could I expect for Alex to actually enjoy himself at practice and the games? Especially, in those terrible polyester baseball pants...
I think about the example this sets for my children.
Jane also added –“It’s continued to be a well-attended group, which has very much bonded with each other over the time we’ve been singing together. A big plus has been that we also see several family members coming in, who have really made this activity part of spending time with their loved one. At our Christmas party, we had four generations of one family present! It is genuinely humbling to see a dementia patient who is “locked in” suddenly brighten up and start joining in when a song begins. Something triggers a memory and response. An unexpected side effect has been the wider surge of interest in this type of work. We have been visited by many mental health and older adult care practitioners, resulting in the formation of several similar groups. This has had a knock-on effect for me as a musician, leading to projects in two nursing homes, two day centres, a continuing care ward, and a day hospital. We’ve also run a training event in the form of an afternoon to ‘learn about Singing for the Brain’ , which 130 people booked up for, and which led to longer trainings for people who want to take this kind of work further – and all from one initial project!”
The sample diet I am providing is one I created for my 2 year old, this doesn't include the milk she drinks, sauces, condiments etc, it is just an idea of how to rotate and some options that are out there.
It's one of those rare weekends when we have loads to do but no agenda. This is called EXCITING in the suburbs, people. Making my weekend wishlist. I will probably get ONE thing done and that would be fantastic.
blupped onto the bonnet
I like to sing and dance. Read and write. Cook and ESPECIALLY eat. I like to shoot pool (but aren’t very good, it’s just fun). And I enjoy watching good movies.
Regardless of what you decide to do, be sure to keep it short. Here’s an example:
Then the pictures came in.
I had never made a mousse before. This was my first! I had a slight panic attack during the process. I thought I ruined the whole thing. I was even about the throw the whole thing down the drain, but then decided to keep on stirring to see what would happen. I was lucky. I thought the gelatin had seized up and became really clumpy. As it turns out, everything was fine... but for about 30 seconds there... I thought I was going to scream because I had no extra ingredients to re-do the mousse... and let's face it... I really didn't want to screw up the first time!
The bar is open every weekday for lunch, offering a mix of sandwiches and salads. It's not until later that I realise there's no kitchen on the premises. "We cook everything off-site at a property about 150 metres away. Then we move everything here." The whole menu has been designed to eat at room temperature or prepared with the only heat source available - a salamander.
08/20/2010 SELL 0.01 usdcad 1.0465
Of course in my naive child’s brain, I believed my parents were the geniuses that had come up with this dish. I had no idea it was a popular appetizer that was quite common in Italy.
PILM: That is some great advice. Anything you’d like to add?
1. Checking the 10 day forecast obsessively. I started this when race day first appeared in the forecast. It’s ranged from a high of 67 (perfect) to a high of 84 (ugh). Yesterday was the worst. Weather.com said 80 for the high, Wunderground.com said 84, and when I was at the gym waiting for pilates to begin, the local news said 72. …schwa? At least we’re all on the same page…? Today, weather.com says the high Sunday is predicted to be 70. If it could stay right there, please, I would really appreciate it.
Party Guidelines:
Najib has much in common with French President Nicolas Sarkozy. Both men are seeking re-election and have wives who are fashionistas who love to sing, although one is a wannabe.Prime Minister Najib Abdul Razak is not unduly worried about being arrested in Europe for ignoring the request to testify in a French court about Scorpene, but he will have one big worry if the French court imposes travel sanctions on his wife, the self-styled ‘First Lady’ Rosmah Mansor.
Fareda: Can’t you see it, sister?
As thou wouldst,
~~Orks~~
Horseradish Cheese & Dill Omelet
2- Pass the Bill Now. Stop telling Congress to pass something that they haven't seen. They don't even know the facts/figures regarding the cost.
Here is the nutritional information for Avia per Kilogram.
Debbie Jean Cook: Dear Friends, Yes, the email was written by me. No I am not connected to anyone not in good standing. I did it because of my love and respect for LRH and the desire to see us correct situations that need correcting within our group
They wouldn't get an education. Because they don't deserve one.
Next year I'll be good, just wait
I stood watching them for about half an hour in my wet clothes, being so grateful that I had put that jersey on because the black and white top would have been completely see-through at that point!
A Prayer of St. Chrysostom
Arianna officially turned 18 months on January 24th, but we just had her 18 month well baby check yesterday. We took her in to find out that she has lost weight since her last checkup! Little peanut only weighs 23 pounds! She grew taller, 31.5 inches to be exact. They aren't too worried about the weight loss, in fact the Dr. commended us for offering her the same meals as we eat (for the most part) for breakfast, lunch and dinner and if she refuses them, then oh well. I know that if I just made her some mac n' cheese or something when she refuses our dinner, that she would eat...but part of me feels like that's me giving in, letting her know that as long as she refuses to eat what we are eating, Mom will make her the good stuff :) Our Pedi agreed! We were told to limit her milk intake to 16 oz. a day, so that maybe she will be more interested in food. I am honestly not surprised that she lost weight, the child never stops moving. Ever. And from what I hear, she is even crazier at daycare! We have to get the lump checked out on her neck again. It isn't gone, so there there are a few tests that we are going to have done, just to make sure. This is happening next Wednesday and she will be getting a vascular ultrasound done first.
Legalizing abortion and maintaining the already gained advances is one of my pet causes. Pro-lifers tend to give me the serious creeps and regardless of what awesome literature they have or don't have standing on their bookshelves (usually my major point of final judgement of any person) they will always primarily be judged by their patronizing view regarding what could very well at some point be my body. A body that not even the Viking has any say over.
In the pan for the fish I heated up the oil. Then I slid the fillets in flesh side down. I let them cook until they were barely starting to brown. Then I flipped them over, added the salt, pepper, and chili powder, and then placed the tomatoes around the fillets. The recipe said to cut them in half but my pan isn’t that big, so I cut them into sixths and hoped it would be close enough. Then I flipped them back just long enough to take the skin off, flipped them up again and called dinner as served.
Whether the ministry of orphan care, or the ministry of adoption, most often this impacts the NATIONS.....plural.
books of poetry, the lastest of which is Chomp Away (Combo) .
no cajoling, no joy,
"i want a scooter. a pink scooter. and benny wants a kitchen. thank you."
So tada! Stays!! Now onto the rest of everything else I need to do. Up next? White batiste gown with ivory underlayers.
hi! i'm jackie from made by the mama monster. i'm a stay at home mama to three little boys. they keep me busy, but in my spare time i try to get some crafting in. it seems like the time for crafting is getting fewer and farther between. i like to make things that i can work on with my boys around .short and sweet.
Answer: The athlete that has the record for most appearances on a Wheaties box is Michael Jordan.
Yaya: Patanong lang po, magkano taxi from Ayala Alabang to Northgate po?
So paper and bags are my problem areas. Also, flat surfaces and not putting things away where they go right away. If I would just sort through the mail and school papers right when I get them in my hands I think most of our paper problems would be solved!! But like I said before I am easily distracted and who like looking through the mail when all you get is bills! UGH!
Ranging from teens to mid 50's it literally is the most requested look. There is something about a 'smokey eye' which implies seduction, sexiness and mystery. Let's face it we all want to feel like that from time to time. The beauty of the smokey eye is that it CAN be adapted to suit ANY eye shape and eye colour...trust me I've done it many times. Not everybody has a large surface area from lash line to brow but even with the smallest of eyes with correct shading and placement of colour the smokey look can be achieved.
A cruel war of foolishness
He has spoken through the Prophets.
Highlight - MAC CCB 'Hush'
Let's hope the Obama Poetic Language Initiative works. It's remarkable to have a President who pays any attention to poetry at all, and inspiring to have one so dedicated to making the form more democratic, hopeful, and less obscure. We'll be watching with interest here at elenabella as poetry unfurls its patriotic wings to soar like an eagle over this great land, becoming more accessible, appropriate, and inspirational for every American.
The first half of this cue is particularly well done: some excellent atmospheric effects (love the echoing piano). Some playing about with Courage’s main theme before we then hear the thematic material for the Doomsday Machine. Not one of my favourite scores but it does have a lot of iconic music.
Chris Caffery – Guitars
ONCE UPON A TIME, a tong time ago, a man took off his jacket and put on a sweater. Then he took off his shoes and put on a pair of sneakers. His name was Fred Rogers. He was starting a television program, aimed at children, called Mister Rogers’ Neighborhood. He had been on television before, but only as the voices and movements of puppets, on a program called The Children’s Corner. Now he was stepping in front of the camera as Mister Rogers, and he wanted to do things right, and whatever he did right, he wanted to repeat. And so, once upon a time, Fred Rogers took off his jacket and put on a sweater his mother had made him, a cardigan with a zipper. Then he took off his shoes and put on a pair of navy-blue canvas boating sneakers. He did the same thing the next day, and then the next… until he had done the same things, those things, 865 times, at the beginning of 865 television programs, over a span of thirty-one years. The first time I met Mister Rogers, he told me a story of how deeply his simple gestures had been felt, and received. He had just come back from visiting Koko, the gorilla who has learned–or who has been taught–American Sign Language. Koko watches television. Koko watches Mister Rogers’ Neighborhood, and when Mister Rogers, in his sweater and sneakers, entered the place where she lives, Koko immediately folded him in her long, black arms, as though he were a child, and then… “She took my shoes off, Tom,” Mister Rogers said.
lest the sun miss the song
The Seeds of Death was among the first ten or so novelisations I borrowed from the library when I first got into Doctor Who back in 1990. And then to my delight, it turned out that my parents had bought me the video that Christmas. I was both surprised and delighted when I unwrapped it back in Xmas 1990. Oh memories, aren't they sweet? The BBC Video had not remastered the original recording so the sound and picture got a bit jittery towards the end. In my childhood innocence, I thought this was my fault because I paused the video too many times.
We received a total of 129 entries for the September event! I have grouped them into 5 different categories, according to the type of mooncakes. I am sure you will have a mouth watering time going through the list below :D
* FREE hands-on workshops designed for children ages 5 - 12 offered the 1st Saturday of every month at all The Home Depot stores between 9:00 a.m. – 12:00 p.m.
* My family and personal friends are not eligible to win any prize.
With the Harry Potter era coming to its momentous finale as the very last film is released (which was better than I had anticipated – I thoroughly enjoyed seeing it yesterday), there has been the inevitable round of memories, reminiscing and ‘Favourite bits of the series’ in the media. One detail that struck me, alongside the great service JK Rowling performed by encouraging a whole generation to read (who will be her successor? We need someone else to fill that gap – and in my opinion, it never will, and never can, be Stephanie Meyer), was the mention of platform 9 ¾ at Kings Cross station. A portal that leads to a fantastical world is something every eleven year old would kill to enter. Of course, she was not the first to put this idea into play – read the utterly magical ‘The Secret of Platform 13’ by Eva Ibbotson (one of my all-time favourite childhood authors, alongside Margaret Mahy), which was published three years prior to the Philosopher’s Stone.
Do you agree that CHA-W had some amazing releases?? Well you should agree, lol, because some of these new products are super hard to get. I just don't think manufacturers can make these products fast enough to keep up with the excitement from all of us crafters. :-) I am excited each month to be able to share with you some of the hottest products out there but I hope that you bear with me on getting the kits to you. I still have yet to get my kits to my DT because I am waiting on some last minute items that have been out of stock forever. LOL!! Debbie has put together another amazing kit for April and I have seen what she has for May and I already can't wait to reveal that one too. LOL!!
i took him to the pediatrician yesterday, and they pointed out that his bottom-right front tooth is about to come in, too. you can see it about to pop out of the gum. his first tooth! another big milestone!
Gram Masala powder – ½ tsp
In this area the skin becomes thicker and there is an increased blood flow to help transfer body heat from the adult bird to the embryos inside the eggs. The more regular viewers amongst you might have even seen the female lightly plucking her brood patch to help her keep the eggs warm.
We all have diverse communities in our lives, and our experiences with them affect our state of mind. These groups are beds of conflict, as anyone with family members can understand. Instead of bickering or blaming, I ask you to think about conflict in a new way. Conflict and contradiction are powerful because they can fuel creativity and growth. (Repeat.) In fact, I think daily personal conflicts are the best opportunities for self-discovery.
A moron can read Shakespeare…….but that don’t make him noble.
2006 saw both Powell and Gatlin run well early, with Gatlin dominating the clock in May. But it also saw Powell complaining of slight injuries and repeated failures to get both Powell and Gatlin on the track in head to head meetings. Reportedly because Powell felt that as WR holder he should be paid in excess of the Olympic and World Champion. In what has been one of the most ridiculous set of races I’ve ever seen in a meet, we were treated to two separate 100 meter dashes at the 2006 Prefonataine Classic – one featuring Justin Gatlin, the other featuring Asafa Powell – since negotiations couldn’t put them on the track together. Gatlin winning his section in 9.88, Powell his in 9.93w.
In those 118.2 innings Brown struck out 102 batters while walking just 40 in route to a 1.90 ERA and a 0.952 WHIP. Pretty impressive numbers, even for A ball. Those numbers got Rob promoted to Double A Tulsa for the 1991 season. If he could translate even part of his 1990 performance at that level he stood an excellent chance of moving up even further in the Rangers organization.
In conclusion, John’s message concerning ‘the glory of God’ challenges each of us to consider afresh how we view the miraculous in our world, enlarging our vision of what constitutes ‘a miracle of God’.”
This time as I hugged him in my arms and told him I love him.
Past Langon down that grey-walled aisle
to/from the Lied Center!
and bail water when you hit one,
Dizziness.
But cast not your foul notions upon me!
With right sides together we pinned the side seams and the inside leg seams and sewed them together on old Jan....very slowly....with poppet removing each pin one....at....a....time. Deep breathing to make a Himalayan yogi master proud!
Except in the case of the World Wars, conscription throughout American history has proven to be highly unpopular and largely ineffective and unnecessary. Mr. Ricks’ call for a Draft to act as a brake on American military involvements would simply not accomplish what he wishes it to accomplish, is unnecessary with our current force structure, and is politically impossible. Other than that, it is a grand idea!
The phrase has been a motto for people for a long time, but the shortened version, YOLO, has gained popularity since the release of the song “The Motto” by Drake and Tyga.
I’m sorry for my absence from the blogosphere! To be honest, the reason is April Showers…we’ve had a month-full of ministry opportunities, including some extra writing projects, two out-of-town-conferences, planning for more JAM Sessions, and some wonderful chances to chat with some VERY enthusiastic pastors and volunteers. So…my blog has taken a back seat. However, the April Showers will hopefully be bearing lots of flowers (or, in Biblical terms, fruit!) So excited to share new ideas and materials with you in the coming weeks and months.
Cardie: Primark.
1. Good choice?
I also love hearing couples tell stories of how they met years later. Their versions are always going to be very different. You may even see them argue about certain details, where one person swears something happened, while the other person swears it didn’t and it was something else.
I still have several things that I do need to do. I have two other books, one for my each parent and their emails. Only I’ve gotten important emails from both my parents after I printed the books. So what’s a girl to do? I can print yet a third book with all the leftovers, but then I’d miss anything that might come in the future (or not). But that would be one small book and probably not worth the money to have bound. Plus it wouldn’t fit with the style of the first two books (one is one year-long and the other is two, a few months wouldn’t match with the rest of the collection). So instead, I’m going to print them out and make a paper book. It won’t be bound like the others, but I can add to it if more come in and it won’t cost as much (actually it will barely cost me anything). Not a perfect solution, but a doable one that I don’t feel badly about.
green beans, a cloud of hot summer dust
searched for the phone located somewhere above his head.
This is an excellent example of a query for a picture book.
True, I have friends and family that I spend time with. But there is, overall, no routine to my life. I have nothing to ground me. I thought that by cooking and setting up a nice home, I would at least have some reason to keep organized and maintain a little order in my life. I am, dear friends, a gypsy girl trying to find some structure.
Sure, not everyone is called to the Ministerial Priesthood, but our baptism does call us all to give ourselves entirely the vocation Christ gives each one of us, and that supernatural fulfilment must genuinely be the desire of Christian families before we can regain a proper sense of what Scott Hahn calls ‘the glory of the priesthood’.
I'm not the only reader to have professed bewilderment, either: in an addendum to his essay "A New James Bond" in What Became of Jane Austen?, Kingsley Amis – whose opinion I greatly respect – admits that he had "tough sledding with The Ipcress File... The endless twists and turns of the plot, the systematic withholding of clues and even of settings in time and place..."
1/4 cup extra virgin olive oil
By the way, in pusat culture, including and especially at Gambang, the botaks are the lowest in the pecking order and the food chain – sometimes literally (if there’s not enough of something, the botaks have to `voluntarily’ sacrifice their share). They also `volunteer’ for the toughest, dirtiest, most dreary work. Everyone starts as a botak.
So, next controversy. On 25 July 2005 Lord Ahmed, whilst talking with Robert Siegel on National Public Radio said that the suicide bombers of 7/7 had an "identity crisis" and, that "unfortunately, our imams and mosques have not been able to communicate the true message of Islam in the language that these young people can understand."
I can't even think of a snappy conclusion. I literally do not know how to put that into words.
Two reasons:
Occassionally, I browse the internet for unique and interesting designers and decorators - well, I really look to find talented people in general. It's such an inspiration to see the work of others, and I love to see how different spaces come to life. Tonight, I stumbled upon a website, Karen Houghton Interiors, that really caught my eye. The firm has been around since 1896 and is based in Nyack, NY. Karen's design principal states that "a room must be right for its time, its place and for people who live in it." So true! She has a staff of 3 designers, along with herself, that transforms homes throughout the NY tri-state area. Although I don't know where Nyack is exactly and I will probably never make it there, here's to betting that they have some gorgeous homes and lucky homeowners- thanks to KHI.
Using a melon baller or a serrated spoon, cut a hole through the top of the cupcake making a reasonable size space for the filling, saving the cut tops.
Anyhow to celebrate the 3rd Birthday there is also a new look on the Blog. There are also some new blinkies so make sure you pop by to check out the look and update your blinkie.
I bent, twisted, and molded two white wire hangers into the shape of a candy cane, then secured the ends together by twisting them then adding hot glue and felt (it's not a scientific thing, but it worked) and began wrapping and wiring my red and white mesh in place.
Note: I am reviewing this book as part of the Blogging For Books program developed by Waterbrook Multnomah Publishing Group. I was asked to write an honest review and received no compensation other than the free book.
1 sheet - Lily Bee Design - Double Dutch stickers (52 pcs)
Middle East/Asia/Oceania Hotel: Taj InnerCircle
And luckily for us we have won several Best in Show awards!
--the need for more affordable housing in Brooklyn
Since Alex is obsessed with dogs, I laughingly slapped my legs and called for him like my wayward puppy. My plan backfired, since then he wanted to take photos of me doing that.
I am lonely for the first time in 8 years. I have no bums to wipe, no one asking where I am every three minutes, no demands for drinks or food. I don't know what to do with myself. Well, actually, I do. I need to get. A. Job. or finish. The. Book. (sshhhh don't mention that. 30,000 words and not touched for months) or even Walk. The. Dog. Yes, yes, hairy mutt, but that only takes 45 minutes.
The FPN posters are right that this paper is very fountain pen friendly. I tried quite a few pen-and-ink combinations, and not one of them feathered significantly. Same for the gel pens and rollerball pens I tried. All of them, even the wettest fountain pens, delivered very sharp, crisp lines. Bleed-through was minimal, but show-through was quite significant with all the fountain pens, certainly too much for me to use both sides of the paper. Show-through was far milder with gels and rollerballs, enough so for me to consider using both sides of the paper with those pens, were it not for another problem.
You’ll have guessed what’s coming next.
We shall stand! We shall stand!
Dress, Vero Moda, chunky necklace, H&M like 5 years ago.
Keno Hawker, Mesa mayor, told the group it has become commonplace for local and tribal governments to enter joint projects, adding the Salt River Community and Mesa are partners in several ventures including the VaShyl’ay Akimel Ecosystem Restoration Project along he Salt River bed.
Several hours later, we find Jonah Hex stumbling across various canyons, nursing his busted ribs and looking for water. He finally finds a watering hole and as he falls down, scooping up double handfuls of water he hears a voice behind him warning not to drink the water.
--Forest City Ratner Companies
You have done awesome in the church nursery
Peel the bittergourd and wash thoroughly. Cut in to round thin slices and add salt, mix and keep aside for about 3 hours.
Every single day I’m amazed at how many people are searching the big web-o-sphere for specific things. Many of those people end up at my blog because their search terms match something in my posts. So just for fun, lets look at the TOP FIVE search term hits:-
As for the headaches, they still come and go. In fact, Monday and Tuesday of this week were especially bad for that. I REALLY need to take my doc's advice and go back to my TMJ doctor. Once she mentioned that, I started paying more attention and yeah, I HAVE been grinding my teeth more, making my jaw pop more (it pops everytime I move my mouth, but it's becoming habit to MAKE it pop while idle), and she thinks it could be causing the headaches.
However, before I start calling Willy Walton all the cunts of the day, let's address the naming issue involved here. The project has been dubbed the "Aberdeen Western Peripheral Route". It rolls off the tongue, doesn't it? Why not just call it the Aberdeen bypass? It's not as if they'd ever consider an eastern peripheral route?
Users build a collage of images by pinning them to their Pinterest board. It can be done in three ways: Use the Pinterest “Pin It” bookmarklet while perusing the internet, upload their own images, or repin other user’s images to your Pinterest boards that you’ve created and organized. Please note that 80% of images and videos are repined.
Chocolate Malt
Fareda: Pleeeease…You’re the expert in getting me out of trouble.
We promised the missionaries a super bowl fare today. I have all this food to prepare and no strength to do it. Wish me well. I kind of hate thinking about food and I feel all germy. Sounds appetizing, doesn't it. Sorry that I'm obsessed with my own frailties.
3 cans cream corn (or canned corn pureed in the blender)
Glinda: Are you ready now?
Size: I usually make a 14 but here I made a 12. RTW I wear 8 petite.
-1/4 Teaspoon apple cider vinegar
I have just started this blog at the end of the work day while waiting to be picked up. As such, I barely touched it. While waiting for my lift, I decided to see if WordPress had dipped into the app world. I was pleased to see that they had and even more pleased that it was well rated, so I downloaded it.
Here goes...
Nothing's gonna make this right again
Elsevier has since withdrawn its support for the infamous Research Works Act, but I hope that doesn’t mean the campaign will dissipate. For the sake of the future of science, the whole system needs to be systematically dismantled and rebuilt free of parasites.
Technically, I spent the weekend with my children and my mother. Sam left for Ohio to collect the honor of his father being inducted into his high school's football and basketball hall of fame. He left Thursday, drove home today.
On-Point was awarded a R51m tender by the Limpopo roads and transport department in 2009 to manage a “project management unit” that designs, implements and oversees roads projects in the province.
1. To be a great mother.
Green Spinach, 1 bunch, cut into bite sizes
1/2 can cream of celery soup
I wonder if there will be much discussion about the artistic merits of the painting. In his book “The Act of Creation”, Arthur Koestler discussed two examples relevant to this.
A number of us went to the Feb. 2011 Scoping Meeting. We've been to a lot of these meetings, but there was something really off kilter about this one. I remember turning to my colleagues & saying "something isn't right here". Several weeks later, we learned that State Senator Carl Kruger had been indicted, for among other things, being in cahoots with the developer. That was why things didn't feel right.
We are the tellers of heritage deep in faith, courage, and intertwined with that of New Hampshire’s birth.
Well, Obama... Hope you enjoyed your stay at the white house, cause fuck you for taking away our freedom. I suppose this means SOPA is a shoo-in. Maybe the Mayans were right; 2012 IS the end of the world.
So, write your cheque in the name of The Redeemed Christian Church of God and then at the back of the cheque write ‘Covenant Partner’.
Without ever reaching the issue of whether there was an actual conflict of interest, the Supreme Court reversed the convictions. Id. at 484, 98 S.Ct. at 1178. The Holloway Court determined that because defense counsel timely objected to the joint representation at trial, the trial court erred in failing to “either appoint separate counsel, or to take adequate steps to ascertain whether the risk was too remote to warrant separate counsel.” Id. at 484, 98 S.Ct. at 1179. The Court determined that this failure deprived the defendants “of the guarantee of ‘assistance of counsel,’ ” id., and necessitated automatic reversal of the defendants’ convictions, id. at 487-91, 98 S.Ct. at 1180-82. Under the Holloway standard, the trial court’s failure to appoint separate counsel, or adequately inquire into the possibility of conflict, in the face of a timely objection by defense counsel, demonstrates ineffective assistance of counsel without a showing of actual conflict of interest. See id.; see also Hamilton, 969 F.2d at 1011 (“[W]hen defendants make timely objections to joint representation, they need not show an actual conflict of interest when a trial court fails to inquire adequately into the basis of the objection.”). In this situation, prejudice to the defendant is presumed. See 435 U.S. at 489, 98 S.Ct. at 1181 (“[P]rejudice is presumed regardless of whether it was independently shown.”); Cuyler, 446 U.S. at 348, 100 S.Ct. at 1718 (“But unless the trial court fails to afford [ ] an opportunity [to show that potential conflicts imperil his right to a fair trial], a reviewing court cannot presume that the possibility for conflict has resulted in ineffective assistance of counsel.”); see also United States v. Sutton, 794 F.2d 1415, 1419 (9th Cir.1986) (“Thus, whenever a trial court improperly requires joint representation over timely objection based on possible conflicting interests, prejudice is presumed and reversal is automatic.”).
The larger pots of sage and rosemary are thriving, but the sage I wintered over (the red pot)got very spindlely last month and had to be cut back - it lasted all winter, and produced enough leaves to keep me in sage rinse from October to March. Now that its outside I've cut it way down, and new sprouts are already coming out.
so.. being the person i am, never skipping out on a party..
So there you have an amateur’s view on why we have smaller household size. There might well be other headings such as criminality and prison population and patterns associated with migration. The main point of this entry has been to emphasise household size is shrinking and to discuss possible reasons. And finally, what for the future, will our average household size decline further from 2.68? Difficult to say but you might expect divorces to increase and we are very much out of line with the rest of Europe. Our life expectancy should also increase in terms of better medical care and diet though obesity and less exercise might offset those gains. We will probably increase our standards of living so that we can afford to live independently when we age or between the parental home and co-habitation/marriage. The birth rate seems to be holding up remarkably well in Irelandthough it is down from 50 years ago, has it stabilised? So overall difficult to say what will happen in the future but the trend in the past 85 years has overwhelmingly been towards smaller household sizes.
The Problems of Restraint
How to link up your project:
Everyone, say hello to Ragnarok, a manhwa by Myung-Jin Lee! The man in the picture is the main character for this story and his name is Chaos. He is a very strong warrior who lacks memories of the past two years. As you probably guessed, Ragnarok follows Chaos’ journey as his past is slowly revealed and as he goes along he picks up his own merry band of friends. In a very brief plot summary like this one, Ragnarok really doesn’t seem to be anything special, but it is.
journal entry: is it weird that i strangely comforted by overcast days? because they make sunny days so much more sunny. and sometimes you just want to know that perhaps, you are not alone in your melancholy.
“You chose to abandon me and four kids, and I can’t get my
Of course I will keep you all updated. Thank you for the amazing emails and phone calls, I can barely keep up with them all! Now that I don't have to type through a plastic bag and can actually charge my iPad and phone, I'll be able to catch up more.
on rainbow trout in my rivers,
Midori days is about a girl who is named Midori.
He said the dti only gave Microsoft a conditional approval, but the company promised to fulfil "one or two things".
And we know that Anthony’s father lost money in an e-mail scam.
My piece added that GPSing doesn’t even prevent “the worst” — abduction, ‘natch, — from occurring. It just goes along for the ride.
BEAR IT IN MIND THAT WITHOUT OUR SECURITY KEEPING FEE YOUR BOX WILL NOT BE DELIVERED AS SCHEDULED.
Jimmy Choo’s and a golden band.
LINK to ALEC model bill designed to lower teacher certification standards:
Were we able to define, comprehend or even imagine Faith, it would cease to belong to the supernatural. Let us make the necessary effort which enables us to receive it as a gift. Let us always go to the end of our strength, to the limit of our endurance and of our courage. This offering of the possible irresistibly evokes the impossible.
So, when this loose behavior I throw off
125 gms/5ozs dark soft brown sugar
He took his cattle lorry out onto the road into the valley, drew it across so as to make any car wishing to pass slow to a crawl, and attached a hosepipe to the standpipe nearby.....then amused himself by aiming the hose at the open windows of the cars trying to pass, soaking the occupants.
Dear Anita, Eartha Kitt II & Betty MacDonald Fan Club fans:
A stone ladder out and up
Back in January 2012, the BBC reported that loans in the Snoddon group, based in Hillsborough, just outside Belfast, had transferred to NAMA. The group, associated with Brian Snoddon, includes The Sprucefield Centre Limited, and note 12 on page 14 of the accounts shows that the Bank of Ireland loan was transferred to Westfield last year. Although the loan is for less than the €20m acquisition threshold usually applied by NAMA to Bank of Ireland exposures, it should have been regarded as associated lending and acquired with the other Snoddon group loans.
who unconcernedly perform a pagan tribal dance...Stoboscopic lights flicker over
I started quilting in my college dorm room at 18 and have been collecting fabric and quilting ever since! Recently I’ve started creating patterns for Moda Bake Shop, Riley Blake, and will be doing to monthly clubs for Stitchin’ Heaven.
I wish I could say that I was bright eyed and bushy tailed today, however, that is not really the case. I am currently trying to caffinate myself out of my sleep deprivation haze. The little guy has been so healthy this year, but last night he spiked a fever of 103.2, and I was STILL up at 3am. Good times.
I am not God "Fearing" in the manner as the artist depicts above.
Indeed, "During this period of the Cold War," Leskovitz explains, "the US Army was working on plans to base newly designed 'Iceman' ICBM missiles in a massive network of tunnels dug into the Greenland icecap. The Iceworm plans were eventually deemed impractical and abandoned," and, "due to unanticipated movement of the glacial ice," the entire subterranean complex was eventually left in ruins.
He pointed out that American situation is indeed much different than those other nations (and not in the “American exceptionalism” sort of way of which the Patrol piece accuses him). Our history, our size, our diversity, and our immigrant population all lend themselves to difficult comparisons with, say, Canada or Norway (or even England).
I am with thee, and will keep thee in all places whither thou goest. Gen 28:15
You see, when I do slow down and look for God, I grab onto a set of "legs" I think are His. It's only after while do I actually look and realize I haven't been following who I should be. During these times I feel lost, lonely, broken and defeated. When I am walking with the Father, I feel loved, secure, peaceful and hopeful.
So, are these spoons made of finest Newbridge silver? Or could this just be Ireland’s meanest café? The Irish Daily Mail decided to investigate.
Obscenity, indecency and lewdness are quite common in today’s media-television shows, news, soaps, popular songs, movies, magazines,books, Facebook, and the internet in general. It probably does not shock us that much because we are ‘oh so modern’ and are not narrow minded like those restrained Victorians! Its also kind of ‘cool’ to be indecent at times in today’s world. Bollywood movies will teach all the Indian guys how to woo a girl by eve teasing her or worse even by raping her. However, even today, we do sometimes get outraged by shameless displays of obscenity and well mostly its the Censor Board that gets outraged which then displays its own obscene power to chop down obscenity to protect the people from getting outraged too!
oh, and rum balls. dayum. That is one good Christmas cookie. Don't even have to bake em, (keeps the booze in) and nothing says Christmas like a drunk 12 year old...
I put my total being in all of them, but not my passion energy. These ventures were creations from others, not mine. I was not able, to express and be who I am.
Irish Cream Mudpie
What makes this festival great is the free admission and really what says summer more than watermelon in early August ? The Carytown Watermelon Festival seems to be the perfect event for everybody. If you aren’t into watermelon they have every other kind of food from crabcakes to pizza. It’s good for families because of all the play areas. And if you just want to kick back and listen to music–local bands are set up all up and down the street offering a sampling of every kind of music.
Life in suburbia is not supposed to be eventful; the very parameters justifying its existence revolve around it being a quiet and comfortable refuge from the stress and chaos of urban life. While I hate the very term “subdivision”, I nonetheless grew up in one but there were huge differences between the modest homes I was raised and the bizarre grouping of McMansions and the people that reside in them I now find myself living amongst. The biggest difference between the two is that the former was in every way a thriving neighborhood with the latter being a collection of miniature country estates filled with disgruntled individuals always spying on those that live next to them.
Thanks in advance.
Oh, David m’lad, we have been onto you for a long long time, you and your fellow shifter Stewie Swerdlow, you scaly little perverts…we have your number, laddies…and we have you by your nubby tails…
The inside was finished with a computer generated greeting, some matching paper and more flowers with clear rhinestone centers- gotta have a little glitz on this girl's card:)
I have an over active mind. I dont consider it a bad thing, sure it means I have trouble sleeping but I also have the ability to do good and creative things with a mind I have trouble shutting off.
Jaleel White and Kym Johnson: 29 (10, 9, 10)
She kept walking eventhough she didn’t know where to go. She just wanted to go far away and being free from all this torture. As she was walking, she didn’t realize that someone was following her.
But how wonderful (and, to me, delicious) to discover an Italian man, living in Africa, producing chocolate in Iceland and offering it at a hole-in-the-wall in Lisbon.
I have a black look I do not
So, I was reading the newspaper (Yes, I know; how very 1950's. Deal with it. I still have dial-up, too.) and there was an interesting story in there that I thought I might share with you....
Not an easy bunch to digitally repair--the Four Flats recordings have an unusual degree of hiss and low-frequency noise, the Acuff sides are way below mint, and a big needle "pit" on a Gospel Lamplighters side had me spending a half hour retouching the noise spikes. But not once did I question my sanity for doing all this. Twice, yes, but not once. Well, maybe three times. Anyway... enjoy!
MC Nolz
Do I need to use a personal day to honor Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. on Monday? No.
This is the roasted chicken we ordered.
When we went on our honeymoon our flight was delayed while the bags of passengers who had checked in, but not boarded the plane were located and taken off. That delayed us by about an hour. That is not an unusual event, but we had the misfortune to be flying on 11 September 2011. We were actually in the air when the Twin Tours in New York were attacked. We has been on holiday to Crete and by my estimation were flying over Paris around the time that the planes hit the World Trade Center. We did not know anything about the incident until we were out of Gatwick airport and in our car, on our way home. We had stopped for fuel and as husband was at the pump I heard the end of a news flash on the car radio and I remember hearing 'skyline changed forever' and 'all flights cancelled'. There had not been any problems a Gatwick. As we drove through the leafy, winding and sometimes narrow lanes of Surrey we heard another news flash, in full this time. Then husband started fiddling with the car radio trying to get more information about the disaster. I switched the radio off. He was driving. Once we were home we were able to see, on the TV, the full incident in all its' technicolour glory, several times over. Even though we had had a long day I did not sleep well on the night of 11 September. My mind was too busy thinking. Why had this disaster happened? Could it have been us? Had we had a lucky escape? Why New York? Why not London or even Paris? At that point the ins and outs and full details of the disaster were not known.
Water- 2 tbsp
Scissors
We have had a topsy turvy year with our little man since his sister was born. That’s putting it very politely indeed. I have been known to phone my husband and ask him if it’s almost home time yet and it’s actually only lunchtime, such is my distress and terror about what he will throw my way next.
So, I am back to Indian ink and a feather which did lighten my day briefly.
Fact: I'm a huge sucker for fall clothing. The coats, the boots, the hats, the sweaters...it's all gold. I love the coziness, easy sophistication and simple stylishness of it all. Each article of clothing is meant to wrap you not only in a plush, soft fabric, but also in a feeling of confidence and stylishness. Suddenly, it becomes chic to cover up. The skin-showing overload of summer gives way to the tasteful body-conscious silhouettes of fall. I'm already on the prowl for a long sleeved minidress...
Clearly we should have spent a little more time in that area.
Operating Systems 3:05 – 4:20 pm
Private, primal language lies within public language, in the powers within the trunks of trees, obscured by the outer bark. And it originates in public language. The sun, in the public realm, causes the seed to germinate. Only then can the roots dig.
I don’t think they deliberately tried to sedate me from Tuesday through to Thursday afternoon when I was discharged but I believe it did make their lives easier as I was hell bent on self destruction and by the simple fact that I was asleep most of the time, it reduced my risk of doing anything. As I was discharged on the Thursay I noticed I had finally been marked down to hourly observations and deemed a low risk, which pleased me as I had never been such a low risk before, and yet I was sad because I knew in my heart that it was only because of sedating meds.
Interestingly enough, mid-way through The artist there is a dream – well, for the silent movie heart-throb awakening to the reality of the brave new talkie world – nightmare sequence when the music stops and all you get are silence and disproportionately loud domestic sound effects. It’s a disorientation that takes us down the conceptual road to the new show at Milton Keynes Gallery. Artist Daria Martin‘s ‘survey exhibition’ consists of four short 16mm films, projected on screens in the dark. I’ll quote from the exhibition guide notes:
And this room, which was intended to be the formal dining room, is now our playroom! I'm planning on putting a craft table in here as well, so then it will truly be "our" playroom and not just Liam's.
My Hubs is so picky when it comes to sweetners, but he will use NuNaturals liquid sweetners because he says they don't have much of an after taste compared to some. I agree, I use it all the time.
The high school years.
But that night the noise continued. As we, one by one, went to bed and the sounds of the kibbutz slipped away into the darkness, the sounds of the Grim Reaper’s tools came starkly into reality.
To be fair, I have to admit that these specimen are few and far between. Contrary to rumor, the streets are not littered with men who refuse to bath, or boys who think that a rancid-sausage musk makes their odorificness more manly.
This week’s edition of “Wanderlust Wednesday” is completely dedicated to Italy! I can’t remember for sure if I’ve mentioned my upcoming trip, but in 87 days I will be going to Italy to visit a friend who is studying abroad in Florence! I’ve been to Italy once before in 2007 (which you can read about here, here, and here), and it was a really great experience. I really fell in love with culture, and found my love for Anthropology there. Well, I’m going back and I’ve found some specific things I want to visit:
Possibly because the students at Reitzhuis were Afrikaners and their unhurt (and I want to emphasize: UNHURT) “victims” black, however, there was an orgy of condemnation from all and sundry, including the international press. The left and their sycophantic media had a field day by hysterically and in unison screaming “racism.”
Holtzhausen said there was also a break-in at the house on Tuesday night, but the robbers could only get away with a small amount of money from a handbag.
While the dough is rising preheat the oven to 350 degrees. Fill a baking dish with 2-cups of water and place on the bottom rack in the oven.
I came expecting “We’re Goin’ On a Whale Hunt” and found instead something deep and meditative, richly dramatic and broad. Ishmael’s narration begins with an apologia for going to sea wherein he asserts, “meditation and water are wedded for ever.” And achieving the sea we readers are at times buffeted by the winds and waves, or harassed by some little duties, but are more often lost in the vastness of the oceans, bobbing on what may as well be a cork in the deep. The Pequod, Ahab’s ship, never touches shore after she embarks, having carried all necessary supplies in her hold, and the isolation of open water is almost absolute. Interspersed in the telling of the story proper are essays on cetology, tutorials on sundry aspects of shipping, a sermon to sharks, and philosophical meditations on sea life (“This Right Whale I take to have been a Stoic; the Sperm Whale, a Platonian, who might have taken up Spinoza in his latter years.”). The fluidity of the novel allows for sometimes surprising turns, as when the action takes the form of dramatic scenes; my favorite chapters, in fact, were soliloquies more likely to be found on the stage. With this stylistic maneuvering Melville deftly convinces us that we’ve travelled with the Pequod for months, years. We don’t have to take his word for it, we can feel it, without feeling the exhaustion from the journey.
In other news, the bees are starting to make brief forays out into the world. I'm a bit disturbed by the fact that many of the little ladies in front of the door have wax on their legs, as if they were ready to go play house somewhere else. But, they keep flying back into the hive, so maybe these are pretend run-aways? I'm really ot sure what to make of it. We're still getting snow off and on, and no flowers are in bloom ANYWHERE around here, so I've been giving them bit of sugar water here and there.
I hope you liked the house concert we performed in your living room. There was so much life in the house that night. Monica has done such a great job bringing sanctuary and order into the rooms. She's doing really well. You'd be so proud of her. We miss you and Grandma. I'm sorry I wasn't around more. I love you.
Visiting honey vendors means checking out the bees, of course.
Best Friday to you all!
“Belly dancer!” he shouts at the top of his voice. “Belly dancer!”
Rows 9-12: Beg dc cluster, ch 1 *skip next two ch-1 spaces, (dc, ch 1) in next four spaces, (dc, ch 1) four times in next space, (dc, ch 1) in next four spaces, skip next two spaces, (dc cluster, ch 1) twice in next space. Repeat from * across, dc cluster in last st.
After inheriting her Aunt's apartment, Diana, well, first she makes out with her cousin Marco, but after she's finished doing that, she checks out her new digs. This is when All Ladies Do It really starts to break out of its shell and become the erotic classic we all know and love. You wouldn't think this would be the case–you know, since it simply features an attractive Italian woman poking around her dead Aunt's apartment. But you haven't lived until you have watched Claudia Koll try on hats and light cigarettes in an apartment that is bathed in Venetian moonlight. Resembling a stylish film noir at times (the luminous Koll looked like a femme fatal in her red gloves and wide-brim hat), Diana puts on her Aunt's fur and heads over the Alphonse's place for a quick booty call. Hoping to lose her anal virginity, Diana heads up to his "bum room," a veritable shrine to the female posterior (there are literally butts everywhere), and prepares her rump to be violated. Telling her that every ass is different, Alphonse shows her pictures of asses that are timid, brave, happy, stupid, clever, and intelligent, and then sticks his penis inside her headstrong, willful, and disobedient poop chute.
tangobaby
You might be thinking that homemade ginger soda is a health drink but I would not go that far. But if your son or someone you know just polished off a case of store bought ginger ale, it is a way better solution. The nutritional qualities are definitely higher and the taste is superior. It is estimated that a tablespoon of standard simple syrup is 48 calories which is a ratio of 1:1, sugar to water. My ratio was 1:2 but it was concentrated by about 1/3. This recipe for sugar syrup is thinner than most and if you like the sweet version go for the 1:1 ratio. It is up to you. So have a glass of ginger soda or candied ginger and feel good about it!
Forex day trading is not suitable for everyone, and not everyone will like it, as personality type is also an important factor. It is critically important that any strategy being used is thoroughly tested before-hand to determine its profitability, potential for draw-down, etc. as is the case regardless of the type of trader you are. Day trading can be exciting as well as profitable, but the responsibility is on each individual trader to protect his equity and state of mind.
– Boots LeBaron –
In the video, the deportees recite things they miss about the U.S.: Thanksgiving, apple pie, “my La-Z-Boy recliner,” “sitting there watching the game … with all the guys while my sisters and mom cook in the kitchen.”
This one is very very effected for oily skin,,,,,,Black clay mask will help you to get rid of Acne(For sure)…..you have to buy black clay mask from market add some rose water or lemon juice or milk in it and then apply it all over you face and wash it when it gets dry…..
Don Jacoby was born in York, Pennsylvania. He began playing the trumpet at age 6 1/2. His uncle, Arthur Ansorg, was his teacher. He became a soloist with the Spring Garden Bank in York at nine and continued to play there until he graduated from high school at 16. During this time he played for the Horn and Hardart Children's Hour on the radio station WCAU Philadelphia, then one year with the "Tasty Yeast Youth Pageant" over WJZ in New York (Don was selected from a group of 3,000 young entertainers). He then entered the Ernest Williams School of Music of Brooklyn, New York. During this time he soloed at Town Hall and Carnegie Hall. He graduated from college at 19 and entered the pop music field.
And your pronunciation’s OK
So very excited, this beautiful girl below is on her way right now, driving from Louisiana to Texas to come meet me and stay with us for a week! Her and her little one Leena. After becoming very very good friends online for a year now, we finally get to meet in person! I think we are both nervous and excited as heck!
So full was I of slumber at the moment
yet it seems
There are certain recipes I'm just drawn to, with no real rhyme or reason behind it. When I came across this recipe in Cooking Light Magazine, it pulled me in, and the next day I was at the market buying all the ingredients. Well, the ingredients I determined were necessary, that is. Originally, this "pizza" (which I put in quotes, because in my strong and judgmental opinion, anything resembling a pizza without red sauce is called a flatbread) was topped with six poached eggs. I swapped out the eggs for center-cut bacon, because runny yolks make for poor finger food. Fun fact: a slice of center-cut bacon has half the saturated fat and calories of an egg.
Cut as many stripes as you like and braid as many ropes as you like. Then hand sew each rope's ends together.
I told Anne that for all she understood me she couldn’t read a book, let alone a mind. I told her that she was mediocre, at which point she told me that Marie, my adoptive mother, was the height of mediocrity and also that Grand Ma Normal Family was “a piece of shit” and “Native City white trash.”
PKR was today urged to stop “wasting time” with the parliamentary select committee (PSC) on electoral reform and to just proceed with a third installment of Bersih to press for firm action.
On day 13 I was in NYC for the band trip, and only managed to squeeze out the 1700 words between hotel and bus (plus a couple of sentences at the Cornell Club).
Not much different from the final LP version, a monitor mix is a rough-and-ready mixdown done at the recording desk, mainly used by the band (and producer) to see what needs tightening/redoing (if anything) prior to the final mixdown. This completely lacks the gentle acoustic rhythm guitar track pervasive through the final LP version as well, though it does emphasize the lovely, simple, emotive Marr electric track. I think I prefer this to the final LP version; it's subtlety wins it for me.
Reluctantly we trudge back down the dirt track as the mist rolls in and the temperature drops.
Organic & Sustainably Grown Local Produce, Plants, Bread & More!
My first stop was at a lawyer’s office on Deaderick Street. Driving this street has always made me a little uncomfortable because it includes the word “dead” and my name, “Rick”. Bad omens everywhere. Despite my concerns, I made it to the parking garage safely and wound up the ramp until I finally found a spot. Upon hitting the sidewalk, the realization hit that I was in Nashville. A man walked briskly past me while muttering to himself. I picked up the words “God” and “Hooters” but couldn’t make out anything else. I am sure it was an interesting conversation, however.
- The impeachment of Chief Justice Renato Corona
DCS Williams said this was “not accurate”. Mr Sheridan referred to a parliamentary inquiry having been told there were “2978″ numbers recovered, and he had “rounded that up to 3000″. DCS Williams replied, “If that is what the MPs were given it will be correct” and added that he believed the figure for PIN codes was 91.
* One would require LPC to respond to Requests for Evaluation (RFEs) within a maximum of six months.
Police meanwhile found a female head wrapped in a jacket in a park in the Chihuahua town of Jimenez, in the most gruesome of 15 murders uncovered overnight, the state attorney general’s office said.
The Lamb of God foreseen from the beginning and spoken of in the Garden of Eden ” was not actually slain much before 33 CE. But his glory was praised by all the holy prophets who, through the Holy Spirit, preached of the coming of Messiah “in the flesh”. Jesus his coming “in the flesh” was the actual beginning of the work for which “the Lamb” indeed was slain.
Heat oil on high, in a heavy fry pan or wok until the surface shimmers. Add chicken with all the marinade (Be careful! It could splatter!) and stirfry until chicken is fully cooked about 7-8 minutes . Watch carefully as the marinade will begin reducing down, bubbling and becoming slowly sticky, and the chicken will become caramelized. It can easily burn at this point, if you are not carefully watching. Reduce heat and add oyster sauce, tossing chicken until it is all coated with oyster sauce.
First: "Early Morning Departure" 22"x26, foamcore, mixed media , corrugated cardboard, collage including paper clocks, Austrian train ticket, bird and assorted dials. Acrylic with soft pastel overlay. This piece was created quite awhile ago and I have fond feelings for it. I was going for a cockpit, dashboard, windshield, morning light space departure.
Maria , Kathrin and Anita
Meeting Richard Street from The Temptations.
The two men have exchanged views on evolution and the existence of God before.
There was only one thing we could do. I set up while he checked out the car. I turned my back for a second to start unpacking the camera & flash and to power up the generator.
Panini America will take the term “bang for a buck” to collectible new heights in July with the triumphant return of Triple Play Baseball to the hobby for the first time since 1994. The fun-for-all-ages 2012 Triple Play Baseball promises a truly unique pack-popping experience that places premiums on collectibility, affordability, education and — above all else — fun.
So, the biggest and strongest from among the pagans took (that is by force) God’s people, and no one did anything about it. God decided to wipe them out. He offered ANYONE who believed in him to be spared, and only Noah and his family took him up on the offer.
In Hybrid, you begin by choosing either the Variants (red team, basically) versus the Paladins (blue team). From there, you are equipped with various weapons and skills to take out the other squad during battles. As you rank up, new abilities are opened up to you, and your killing potential grows. Fortunately, Hybrid has plenty of maps and a lot of game modes, so the grind of ranking up your levels should not become too repetitive.
I kill myself sometimes.
I am passionate about music and family. I also enjoy laughing, traveling, cooking, writing and taking naps. I’m a pretty easy-going guy and I like setting reachable goals and achieving them. I love to play, watch and follow football, basketball and soccer.
On another note, Fifa wanted more Africans to be able to attend the tournament but they now reveal that only 11,300 people in Africa made ticket purchases - and the reason? Africans don't have access to computers or credit cards! No, you don't say! Who would have thunk that the dark African continent would be backward and lag behind every continent on this planet?
But, in Canada, parties of the centre or centre-left have avoided a positive moral and values discourse opting instead for a focus on the economy where their track record is surprisingly good. Over the past decades they have been the ones who have championed fiscal prudence, no doubt because they care about government, its resiliency and capacity to pursue the public good. They are also the ones who believe in investment in people, tools and infrastructure, all essential to the global knowledge economy. But “it’s the economy stupid” takes you only so far – it is time that centrist and progressive politicians staked out the moral ground.
22 form
-”Scientifically proven ,hair grows around 1/2 inch ….”
The same old song
19. 409 Round Hill Rd… Asked $2,195,000. Sold $1,300,000. Started 8/2002
To be honest there were other reasons as well but I will not mention those here.
24/10 – 30/10 2010
For the grape’s sake along the wall.
Well, thank goodness Richard Branson has a son. There would be no title of Duchess for Pippa but a private island in the Caribbean? Sounds like a dream come true. And there would be Hollywood A-listers scrambling for an invitation...
Such is the way with amorous affairs.
Together the group raced northward through the trenches, hastening to engage their final adversary in the assault as King Kroma regarded them with a cold and gleaming glow. By now it seemed that Orcus’ minions had begun to further adapt to the party’s strategies as the high priests erected a wall of wind to shield themselves from Meryk’s attacks–while further magic served to bulwark them against additional ranged assaults. Cassandra found her opening salvo of fireballs and magic missiles falling ineffectual–counter-spelled and absorbed in turn.
The most important part of catering services includes food. Choosing the best cuisine is very important to make your event a grand success. First you need to have an estimate of the number of guests expected at your function.
In effort to continue on in the spirit of progress and innovation, I have decided to double post in honor of our blog grand opening. It is my sincere hope that this blog becomes the most popular blog about Second Life and issues of world peace in the whole world, and if not in the whole world, then at least in the Midwest region of the Unite States of America.
To help me through the day
Gabriel Is an Archangel that is connected to everything to do with children, from their conception to raising them to providing for them in every way. Archangel Gabriel not only informed Mother Mary that She was going to give Birth to Jesus the Christ, but also informed Mary’s cousin, Elizabeth, the she was going to give Birth to John the Baptist.
Chicken and Ham Jambalaya
Let me break it down for the curious.
As I was speaking to this group of good people, I could see them listening intently, but still not getting my point entirely. So I asked them two simple questions.
Palatable characters, easy to digest
There is a lesson to be learnt here. One of many I’ve discovered since undertaking the most eventful, exciting and beautiful journey of my life.
Andrew Fredericks, 40, Suffern, N.Y.
“Actually, brilliant idea,” I began. “You know what you should do?”
I hope you will join us at FCCB for this week's challenge. Can't wait to see what you come up with.
1) I know squat about wine.
march for these States,
Herne Bay Gazette reporters drove more than 100 miles trying to follow McMahan’s case through the court system.
The Winner will be announced on Thursday so please do check back to see if you were the lucky one!
2091.***E-IV/5/2000. On the corrupting influence of the “freedom of expression” interpretation of the First Amendment. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Letter C-13.)
*2 tablespoons flour
*I am praying the Minis manage to smile, not fight, shed no tears, don't have a constant stream of nasal drainage, and manage to keep their clothes clean.
Normally, if there is an update for the Firefox browser, the update notifications are displayed as popups rather than webpages. A better way to check for any update in Firefox is go to the Help optionàselect “about Firefox.” If the browser needs an update, it will display something that says “apply update.”
In business, imitation gains potency from amoral quarters. “It is a lot less risky. An imitator knows that his product or service has worked in the market before. He is also equipped with the analysis of how the market received the innovation,” says Rakesh Basant, professor of industrial policy at Indian Institute of Management, Ahmedabad.
· 725 km new lines, 700 km doubling, 800 km gauge conversion and 1,100 km
Indeed. Except.
I’m not sure if I’m the only one thinking this, but I think the degradation of society is caused by apathy. Whether it is those in charge or those who could change things, they all are way too apathetic.
Room was one of the New York Times’ 10 Best Books of the Year in 2010, and made the shortlist of vacation reading for President Barack Obama, so there’s plenty of critical acclaim to back up my assertion that this is a really phenomenal read. I finished it in three days last week, which you’d think would mean I chose some ambitious 500-page tome to fill the intervening days and segue into this week. ….I watched about 600 old episodes of Law & Order instead.
If your ad copy and graphics have interested your prospects, they want to know, “What do I do next?” By Toss ‘Em Out, I mean tell your prospects how to proceed. A call-to-action is a brief final persuasive statement that tells the reader what to do next to inquire about or purchase your products or services. Make it directive versus merely informative. A strategically placed phrase, such as “Call today to schedule a visit” will make your telephone ring far more than a statement in your ad copy that says “We welcome you to stop by.”
the cabin
Produced by Jerry Goldstein (he also contributed one song to the proceedings), 1968's "Creation" didn't exactly set the world on fire, though it's far better than most mid-'60s of ferings. Propelled by Budge's nasty growl (imagine Eric Burdon after a week long bender), in contrast to most of their contemporaries who were pursuing ever more sophisticated arrangements, the band exhibited a penchant for roaring Animals-styled R&B (check out "Painted Woman", their blazing cover of Screamin' Jay Hawkins' "I Put a Spell On You" and the original "Bring It On Home (Can't Get By Alone)"). The band's other area of interest seemed to be drug-oriented material; check out the subtle "Speed" and their cover of Love's "Signed DC"). Intriguing for it's raw and rugged sound in
I’m rambling! It must be all the medicine I’m taking. On average, I pop about nine pills daily. It’s only 2.44PM and I’ve already taken six pills. :) if previously, my productive drinking hasn’t destroyed my livers yet; I’m thinking maybe my pills will finish the job. (TOUCHWOOD). Speaking of drinking, omfg it has been too long since I’ve tasted tequila on my tongueee.
I was scared to make quinoa at first, the name is so fancy I thought it would be hard or to time consuming, but it was SO easy! The fact that it looked exactly like bird seed threw me off a bit at first too, but it came out great! Quinoa has lots of protein and fiber and they were really filling.
3. What a beautiful little war!
I cut the die and cut strips of card stock and weaved the "basket".
The second reason is that unless you already have a solid reader base, making self-publishing work for you is a lot of work. You have to format your book, design your cover and make sure it isn't shudderingly horrible, upload your book to Amazon/Smashwords/whatever other places there are, and then do the initial marketing push -- all by yourself. You could hire professionals to help you with these different aspects, of course, but then you are the one footing the entire bill.
A few minutes later Ashton randomly said, "Mom, who invented the Internet?" I resisted the temptation to say, "Al Gore." And said, "A bunch of people who worked in the government." This was not satisfying... he wanted to know their NAMES. :)
I've been through this before, I know the routine, but I HATE IT! I HATE IT! I HATE IT!
into minds within range.
40.404062 , 93.633678
Your neighbor?
And what a huge difference that is.
who immortalized forgotten souls,
The urge to leave still hounds me like a habit
tears
When Streisand was selling millions of records in the 1960s, she was competing for the Billboard charts with the likes of the Beatles, Bob Dylan and the Rolling Stones. Here’s a fun fact: Streisand was born in 1942, the same year Paul McCartney was born; Dylan was born a year earlier and Mick Jagger was born in 1943. So despite her being the same age as McCartney, Dylan and Jagger, Streisand seems indefinitely older. And why is that?
But first I’m headed in for a couple of early mornings and a day of putting it to the grindstone, so to speak.
Happy Birthday Treston! We adore you- high volume, all boy, and just so dang cute!
With Brown- to side of face, sc in each st around, if you end in the back sl st around to the side for handle, ch17, attach with sl st to opposite side, sl st in next st, turn, ch1, sc in each ch. join with sl st to next sc on beg side. Cut.
Inf2: 3 hits to save.
There will be disappointments; I know you will be able to handle them.
She starts this week! Two hours a day, three days a week. She keeps telling me, "Mama, you're going to miss me so much when I'm at school." She's not going to miss me. I'm going to miss her. And you know what? She's probably right.
breaks on the sheltering bars.
I usually don't like stories that are re-told. However, I find this edition to be very nice. All of the stories are told in verse which the children loved. I also find that the versions of these stories still remain very true to the original tales and provide very young children a good introduction to these classics. If you can't find this particular anthology...OR if you have older children with longer attention spans, I highly recommend that you check them out. They are great classics for Christmas time.
One thing for sure, the 13th general election won’t be in June anymore. It will be delayed but that doesn’t mean Najib will concede to a cleanup of the electoral roll. For that to happen, the people will have to keep on demanding for their fundamental right to a clean ballot. Bersih 4.0 may have to be called.
I know what a large chunk of you will be thinking; “blah blah, been there, done that” etc, etc. While I fully agree the games industry is becoming over-run with samey military shooters, I actually really enjoyed the original Black Ops thanks to it’s enjoyable storyline and little extras (i.e. Dead Ops and Nazi Zombies). Plus the gameplay is about as tight as you will find in an FPS.
I'd stay in the garden with Him though the night around me be falling,
So I definitely appreciate the skin pick me up! And that makes it easier to look for other foundations. Since leaving Bare Minerals I've been a full coverage liquid foundation girl. And that was all due to acne scars. Now that they're fading I can look at other lesser coverage options. I'm going back on the hunt for the perfect foundation. For me foundation is the setting and without the setting I don't wear the other things, so it's vital to my makeup routine! I'm gonna start with drugstore foundation and then will look at some other brands I'm interested in: Nars, Makeup Forever and going back to Bare Minerals.
So I really wanted to share how much I love this necklace with one of my fabulous readers!
Last night I was thinking about Valentine's Day and these lyrics from a song by Sanctus Real came to mind...
*scratches record*
Maybe I need to think about what I really want to do and go for it.
Not really. It’s all a bit hush hush. So I shall be vague. There was an auction in December somewhere. And the aforementioned publisher put in a jolly bid and sent me home-made biscuits and hand written scrolls! (And I’d always loved their books so how could I resist?) This series is aimed at the same age group as my Cinnamon Grove books – but it’s quite different.
The President of the Republic shall be sworn in before the People’s Assembly before assuming his duties by repeating the constitutional oath mentioned in Article 7 of the Constitution.
For whose sake, hence-forth, all his vowes be such,
And now, this year, Don DeLillo’s Libra:
The photo in question was of Mac Tonnies, it's seen in the left side-bar. This was an image that (I think) he took himself. This photo makes him seem a little more dramatic than he actually was. He was, well, cuter than that.
Wish I had had the time to stay and help her finish it!
Oh, the (in)humanity!
Gluten and Dairy Free
Burning bridges, shore to shore,
I believe this to be a great build for PvE servers, and one I use when I'm only PvEing. PvP-wise, you still have your good attack and defenses as help, but you would be very predictable.
It has always been this way. Book publishing is a high burn-out industry, and it offers little compensation for a very high workload. Many people who enter will leave it within a few years. I still have submission lists from books I submitted in 1996: when I look back on them now, not a single editor remains in the same imprint (many of which folded), and 90% of them have left the industry.
This splendidly festive edition of DWM 403 is out now, price £3.99. It just wouldn’t be Christmas without it!
And we are getting the numbers for that now.
Since it is school holidays I thought I'd better do something "proper" with the kids (and perhaps because we were all going stir crazy at home) so we went berry picking over near Orange, at Huntley Berry Farm. We spent over an hour wandering around picking our own, fresh, delicious berries, oh and tasting along the way of course too.
Coffee break, after which the speakers will answer questions.
So here they are:
romans 8
and wishing and hoping for her very own Amineko,
The homemaker is also responsible for looking after the family's assets - by carefully laundering and mending clothes and household linens, by keeping appliances clean and working according to their specifications. Everything that can be kept going - every towel and sheet you keep using before you turn it over to the rag bag, will save you money. Many of the things you do to save money in the home will be environmentally sound too.
“I didn’t say anything,” the little girl answered. “She was sitting in a chair crying, so I just crawled up in her lap and cried with her.
1. Even Ayn Rand died on social security.
on the cover pic! And in the inside, on
Here’s a great Occupational Therapy activity for those of you with children who are not quite ready for the pre-handwriting worksheets. (Those are the ones where your child traces a dotted straight line that connects one object to another on the opposite side of the page, then a wavy line, then a zig-zag line.
“When it’s not appropriate for the child, what you’re going to end up with is a child in crisis and a classroom where the educational process is completely disrupted.”
The crisis must be something that your protag can't solve easily, because the challenge of solving it sets the story in motion. This event may send your character on a quest or mission... even if the mission is to discover themselves.
So what’s been going on in my life?
Action is also another way to force movement in design. Below I provide some photos of rooms that show all of these elements. See if you agree that there is movement in these spaces.
Here's something special. I found this at one of those cheesy shops that sell Paris souvenirs. It's become my most prized possession. I'm going to take it home in my carry-on to make sure I don't lose it.
Here are just a few things I received:
This is actually unbelievably simple, as all you need is two colours, and a disposable cosmetic sponge. I used MAC Neon 8 and Rimmel Shocker.
And that's when I feel it. Fingertips.
To know more about the movie do visit Reliance Digital Store, Lokhandwala, Mumbai and meet the stars on Saturday, 11 Feb, 2012 at 6:00 pm
Yes. The Gastien Series is historical fiction/family saga. There will be at least four books in the series, possibly five. Tristan Michel: Bloodline of Passion (Book 3 of the Gastien Series) will be out sometime in late spring of this year.
Irving Whitman was assigned the case, one that remains cold all these years later.
So there you are in a nutshell as to ahy I have been absent
life.
So in 1995 Prime Minister Jean Cretien declared the observance. I guess the rest of the country never got the memo.
I think once you are a registered "follower" you shouldn't have to verify your comment...after all, how many porn spammers are named CremeMagnolia? But that's just me. I have my blog set to post immediately, I simply don't have time to moderate. And I know that anyone who posts to my blog has to verify their post...sorry I can't help it.
This list of the 613 mitzvot (the commandments) presented here, are based on the list compiled by Rambam in Mishneh Torah (oral tradition, that was later written down). Commandments that can be observed today are marked according to the Chafetz Chayim’s Concise Book of Mitzvot. The laws are divided into positive and negative commandments, but not in my list because of lack of space. There are also laws that only refer to Israel. Commandments that cannot be observed today primarily relate to the Temple, its sacrifices and services because the Temple does not exist and criminal procedures because the theocratic state of Israel does not exist. This is perhaps something for Dominion Covenant Church in Omaha to think about (read my text “Conservative Religiosity – Death Penalty For Gays”, April 30).
This as been requested by my Daughter who's friend is just passed her 12th week into her pregnancy and has now announced to the world. The baby's room will be in creams and beige's. I have a shadow box, in which this card will be placed in to for safe keeping. Just waiting for the paint to dry.
Well, I don't know how many readers I have lost by not being here in so long :D but here's wishing those of you who drop by a very happy, memorable and prosperous new year! May Good Luck, Good Health and Good Fortune be your closest friends in 2011 and always!
Partridge–I am a great whirring, with open wings.
I'm doing pebbling and my version of McTavishing in the applique squares.
Next, stop resisting change because it makes others uncomfortable. Aren’t you tired of pretending to still fit that “old” you? Be true to the true you, no matter what.
A radio podcast speaker that I heard recently said that he would pay $10,000 to go back and tuck his kids, now young adults, into bed one more time. Last weekend, when Babyboy was calling from his bed for the 4th or 5th time, Daddy said, "I'm saving myself $10,000." and headed upstairs. I didn't quite get it. "Remember, the $10,000? I want to tuck him in while I still can." Good point Daddio.
Let's move on to flipping out. Flipping out - screaming, getting angry, throwing things, whatever - is nothing more than an emotion. It is not an effective way to shape the behavior of others. I've had plenty of people flip out on me in my lifetime, and never once did I walk away thinking "wow, they are so right, and I am so happy they flipped out because now I have really learned something." No, the opposite happens; you learn to avoid them, to conceal behavior that they find unacceptable, and to feign contrition in order to get them to calm down. Of course, you also feel completely itimidated, scared, and physically threatened. I cannot learn under those conditions, and will in short order come to resent and avoid any person who treats me that way.
Then Mr. Precious and I painted the cabinets a nice bright white a couple of years ago.
I am grateful for my step-mother, who cared for my father for several years before his recent death, bringing him love and comfort when he needed it most.
With CHA coming up next weekend, we are saving up for lots and lots of new product - hooray!! But in the meantime, we have gotten in a few new lines including:
Till her blood was frozen slowly,
But "The Talk: Nonblack Version" was evidently enough for Derbyshire to get axed from NATIONAL REVIEW who strangely enough gave him the royal chopping via email 'stead of in the usual face-to-face manner that had been utilized in the past. I guess "letting the man go" might be fine considering how that rag has degenerated into something that remains a shadow of it's perhaps previously shadow-y former self...after all, it's their publication, but let's just say that if Derbyshire has followed in the footsteps of the aforementioned pundits who also got the NR guillotine then perhaps he is in good company. In many ways the entire affair makes NR look like total assholes especially considering how that rag has pretty much devolved into a fraidy cat Republican Party mouthpiece as opposed to an outlet for interesting outside-the-liberal/conservative mainstream views 'n opines such as the kind Derbyshire posted for good or bad.
Now, you might think that history and the Irish would hold O'Neill responsible for that terrible fate of their country. But they don't. Exactly the opposite: they embrace O'Neill as the greatest of the fighters who stood firm against the English, well, until he fled. (As we've said repeatedly, the Irish are a unique breed.)
That is what Hubby said last night. LOL! We are at the Coushatta Casino in Louisiana and Hubby overdid it just a bit.
For example: The sidewalk on Dean Street that will be used by arena patrons to walk from the arena parking lot to the arena has an effective width of 3.2 feet instead of the 11.5 feet disclosed in the FEIS. This margin of error is typical, not the exception.
The decision ended Daniel Plata’s 12-year stay on Texas’ Death Row. It might also lead to the end of George Denkowski’s career as a licensed psychologist. Judge Ellis’ decision emboldened one of Denkowski’s colleagues, Jerome Brown of Bellaire, to file a complaint with the Texas State Board of Examiners of Psychologists. If Denkowski loses his license, the cases of 17 other Texas men on Death Row—men he determined were not mentally retarded—could be re-examined. And Texas’ status as a national outlier in cases involving mental retardation could be changed for good.
Summer is almost here. The weather is getting warmer and we all know what that means: it's time to watch what we are eating. No more coats, no more jackets, no more heavy clothes to cover up any damage we did over the winter.
to no avail. The seasons ran out of time.
311) red and green chillies gleaned from the garden
-To speed up digging, I recommend moving your shovel to the top of your inventory. Less movement = less tediousness.
That’s why you came home and found me
The movies over for the foreseeable future, Parker had to put Elvis in front of audiences again or admit he had run Elvis’ career into the ground. Parker arranged for a television special – a one man show – unique in and of itself for the time. Television; having launched Elvis to the national stage in 1956, was either going to re-launch Elvis or be the full circle book end to his career in 1968.
2 TBS Amaretto
Just what are the bonds we should believe in?
Then add a tiny sea shell, or smaller button on top of it.
For the next 20 years, Debbie and her mother drove to the prison twice a year to oppose parole for both men.
"Americans are dogs.
Patrick Turner had a solid but unremarkable career at USC. Mark Sanchez made my head dizzy with possibilities; he’s now the starting QB for the Jets and I don’t hold it against him. I think about what would have been had he remained for his senior year. Would it have stemmed the tide? Sanctions were coming no matter what. That 2009 defense was going to get exposed. Pete Carroll would’ve left anyway (right?), but losing his senior All-America quarterback instead of having a freshman All-America quarterback returning wouldn’t have helped. #1 and #6 played well and when they didn’t play well they played for USC, which means that so long as your name is not R. Jay Soward I will love you despite your drops, picks and false starts. #1 and #6 are still kneeling somewhere in the Arroyo Seco representing so much potential and promise and now all of that is memories and dreams, and that’s all they get to do now that my tangible connection to them is gone. Still, it’s a beautiful picture. I think about it idly, when my day turns to in-between moments and it makes me oddly happy, thinking about a 22-year old me thinking about the future.
USC
We have our Celestial Molecule, our human molecule and the charge of energized molecule that is creating one full molecule. Instead of being and acting separately, they are fusing into one. I am so sorry, that is about the best way I can describe it.
When I was getting ready for my 34 week doctor's appointment, I had a sneaking suspicion that I should be prepared to be hospitalized (given my history of being hospitalized for high blood pressure at 35 weeks for both of my previous children). And, when I was at my appointment, I was right. My blood pressure had sky-rocketed and was at scary levels and I had suddenly developed gestational diabetes. I was hospitalized for the remainder of my pregnancy. The nurses were wonderful and kind. They gave me a private room so I wouldn't have to watch all those other women getting their babies and going home, and when I couldn't afford to pay for cable for all that time I was in the hospital, they went out and got me a tv and dvd player from one of the nurses meeting rooms and took turns bringing me movies from home. We got my diabetes under control with the help of insulin injections. But no matter how much medication we tried, we couldn't get my high blood pressure under control. We tried to make it to 38 weeks as that is the earliest time they recommend delivery for a gestational diabetes baby to assure that the baby's lungs are developed. In the meantime, I was getting weekly ultrasounds and daily stress to check on the baby and we realized that my baby was beginning to get awfully quiet in there. There were days that we did 3 stress test on the baby and we never did get one that was right. And even on the ultrasounds, she was getting awfully quiet. It was getting a little scary. And at 37 weeks, my doctor had had enough, the baby was breach, my blood pressure was way too high and the baby was showing signs of having had enough. So we went in for a C-section.
No word yet if Megan Fox is signed for the love interest.
Brooklyn Tech junior Neil Alacha stood near a display about “Brooklyn at War,” which included a hand-sewn American flag made by a Brooklyn resident during the Civil War, as well as a musket and sword from the Revolutionary War that were excavated from the basement of a Brooklyn home, found near the remains of a soldier.
The news provides a boost to ­Britain’s hard-pressed motorists who have seen fuel prices soar.
Of course, nothing “happened” except for a false claim of rape, a possibility Roberts never appears to have entertained.
“This quest is a homage to the H.P.Lovecraft short story ‘The Shadow Over Innsmouth’, featuring a very similar plot”
Today I took a trip to Target today in hopes of picking up some nice cards for my collection. I decided to buy one of those packages that has an autograph and four packs and costs 12 bucks. Then I also decided to pick up a value pack of this year's NBA Panini Prestige.
1. In a large bowl, coat the lamb with the garlic, honey, mustard, rosemary and olive oil.
The album will be bundled with a 30-minute DVD featuring exclusive behind-the-scenes footage of Mariah Carey recording her second Christmas album, candid interviews with the artist discussing her inspiration behind the album and reminiscing about the holidays and favorite traditions, footage of her album photo shoot with acclaimed photographer David LaChapelle, interviews with Mariah Carey’s mother Patricia Carey and composer Marc Shaiman, and pictures from Mariah’s personal photo holiday collection.
3) Like ::steph chows:: on Facebook. Leave a separate comment saying you did, or already do follow.
That starling beak is a wicked looking weapon viewed from close range and I had the uneasy feeling he might decide to poke my eyeball. I couldn't quite get my mind around being the object of this birds affection. Chris's young twin boys were afraid of the dive bombings we were being subjected to as well. This was a wild animal after all!
‘No, she resigned,’ he sighed. ‘And that’s what made the break-up feel real. You know, after she broke up with me, I didn’t feel any different. I mean, I love her. But she was right. I took her for granted. And when I went in to work the next day, it hit me so bad. There was this huge empty space…’
A hybrid can also be an angelic human. So, while they are on the planet, you think of them somewhat as a hybrid mix. But when you leave your form, when you abandon and glorify, then what you do is you return to what you can think of as this side, this realm, where a number of things—as you well know, and that is an entirely different conversation. But some will choose to simply remain in this realm as their angelic self, whereas others will continue on. They will either incarnate as starseed or on other planets or on Earth, or they will return to their ships. So there are a variety of ways in which we tend to think of as hybrids. And so that is the way in which we use this term in speaking to you.
I've not dropped off the face of the blog-o-sphere! My mom and I have been doing the "festival circuit" - doesn't that sound so cool? We really have been having fun and so far so good. We are learning so much as we do each one -
2001: A Space Odyssey (1968)
in life. He has just about driven me to the point of
Come on! Are you kidding me!? Ladies, I know sometimes we ask our partners/husbands questions and we have an idea in mind already of what we want the answer to be. I have engaged in this type of behavior before in which Doug answered my question and I doubted him and he says, “Well then why did you ask me the question?” In the case of the juju shirt, what I was hoping for was a yes or no answer, not an internal psychological assessment of whether such a thing as juju exists! Clearly, I believe in bad juju or else I wouldn’t have asked the question.
So here goes. This is a list of things I’m super keen to do, and things I’ve done that I would whole-heartedly recommend to ANYONE – visitors and locals alike!:
The last six years Rodriguez spent becoming college-ready was like a punishment, she now feels, without the financial ability to continue college.
12am or maybe more like 2am: Lay down
Buy Cottonelle, 12 pk between 7/8-7/31
Chamille's is a bit shorter in details, but still learning happening. She's been hanging out with her dad more lately because he's been giving her rides. I get little snippets of her life when she hangs out in the kitchen with me while I do the dishes, or late at night when she feels restless.
(Jesus bridged the gap between Heaven/God and earth/humanity)
I've poked around about whether applying the inverted barometer adjustment is a good idea. My best guess is it's unnecessary in the long term, but this short data set makes it helpful (see Realclimate). Goddard denies it, but in general I find him unpersuasive.
Happy Tuesday, everyone!
I wish I’d started doing so a very long time ago. Hopefully it’s never too late.
What else? Oh, Lillian is still here with her friends. Matt will not let me smudge the house because he's certain I will fuck it up after the cat raping incident he was involved in that very much did not work. Which he probably is right because I don't feel qualified to do this. But we've noticed that if you are watching TV on the couch at night, and you've got maybe one lamp on so it's kind of dark but not too dark, you see flashes of light in the cubby hole. It makes it really hard to focus on my Basketball Wives show if this is happening.
Generally he and his wife would show a visitor around, finishing the tour with the chapel. There, in the chapel, the presence of God was so strong that guests – Christians and not-yet-Christians alike – would be impacted powerfully just by His presence. Some would weep. Some would find their legs suddenly gave way. Rather than lead a ministry time / prayer, Roy would choose to leave the room so the visitors could engage directly with God. Often he and his wife would follow up with teaching about “what just happened?” afterwards (over a cup of tea, also a prominent feature of the book!).
When I was growing up, my dream was to live in City Island. It wasn't really about City Island, per se. I loved the water, the boats and the marina and City Island was the only place I had ever been that had those things. Having grown up in the South Bronx where swimming in the summer meant playing in an illegally opened fire hydrant, going to City Island was a jaw-dropping experience.
Hebrews 13:20"Now the God of peace, that brought again from the dead our Lord Jesus, that great shepherd of the sheep, through the blood of the everlasting covenant, Make you perfect in every good work to do his will, working in you that which is wellpleasing in his sight, through Jesus Christ; to whom be glory for ever and ever, Amen."
The Gospel story both begins and ends with a stupendous miracle. At the beginning we are told of a baby boy born with no human father, and in conclusion we hear of a dead man brought back to life. From start to finish the Good News of Jesus Christ challenges our credulity. Notice who were the first witnesses of these things. The first to learn of Jesus' resurrection was a group of women. St Luke tells us (Lk 24:10--11), "It was Mary Magdelene, and Joanna, and Mary the mother of James, and other women which were with them, which told these things unto the apostles. And their words seemed to them as idle tales, and they believed them not." The first to hear of the birth of Christ were a bunch of shepherds, abiding in the fields, keeping watch over their flock by night.
live in the Blue Mountains you can order it in
My simmering contemplation of the current crisis was crystallized by two chance readings that, on the surface, seemed unrelated. The first began as a conversation about teaching I was enjoying with a friend in the Philosophy Department who glancingly referred to “the only essay on education that Hannah Arendt ever wrote – and it’s all about the American educational system” — did I know of it? I raced home and pulled Arendt’s classic collection, Between Past and Future, from my shelves.
With the help of EatSmart & the Precision Pro Kitchen Scale and can weigh my food. The food item I always have the toughest time with is hamburger meat for making taco's & such! I separate it all after I buy it so its nice to get the right weight for my portions to freeze!
“Single family rentals are very distinct from multifamily and they behave very differently,” said Khater in an interview with Real Estate Economy Watch. For example, on a per unit basis, rents for single family rentals run 1.5 to 1.6 times higher than multifamily. Unlike multifamily, millions of single familyrentals are listed on MLSs by real estate brokers, many of who represent new owners in acquiring investment properties. As the for-sale inventory has trended down since 2005, the rental share rose 13.3 percent last year alone. As of the end of last year rental closings were up 11.5 percent year-over-year while prices fell 9.8 percent during the year. Demand is strong. The national average months’ supply for single family rentals was 4.5 months in December compared to 6.2 months for homes listed for sale.
My peponi, you are the strangest
I think you might have to live out you're premonitions,
That is little comfort to many geologists, however, who I suspect are going to be scratching their heads over the precise geometry of this one for some time.
Geoff Mack wrote "I've been everywhere" back in the 50s and it's been covered and adapted by almost everyone. Johnny Cash sang it, and I remember hearing it on BBC Saturday night TV back in the 60s by, I think, The Mudlarks.
Something has come over me lately though. Instead of paying out for a better case I said to myself...
Welcome to the last challenge of 2011. Can you believe it's almost 2012? I know, me either!
Okay...I think I have officially lost my mind! I totally forgot today was Tuesday AGAIN!!! I still need to get The Stamping Boutique challenge up on the challenge blog and I was suppose to have this post up earlier....grrrr. I thought I was having memory issues while I was pregnant....this is getting ridiculous!
The fighting mailman wins and helps repopulate the globe by impregnating another man’s wife. In the end, the United States is back and regular looking people are dedicating a statue to him. In essence, it’s like the end of civilization never happened. I just hope that Tom Petty got to keep his cool house on the dam.
Establishing norms of behaviour, including linguistic behaviour, is important for one very crucial reason: without knowing what is typical, we cannot tell what is deviant. This is because assessment, whether informal, academic or clinical, is basically a comparison. We suspect that our child may be running a fever today because she is behaving funny today, compared to her normal self. But how can we tell whether our multilingual child is showing signs of disorder or just being, well, multilingual?
A unique characteristic that most Uruguayans share is drinking mate everywhere (in the park, on the beach, walking in the street, at the hostel, in the stores, literally everywhere). Mate is a sort of tea made with dried herbs steeped in hot water. Everyone walks around carrying their mate cup, which looks like a gourd with a straw, and a thermos of hot water tucked under their armpit to refill.
Good Luck and enjoy!
Alison McGhee, writing instructor and author of many wonderful novels including Shadow Baby and Rainlight, once taught a very effective exercise in a writing class I attended.
He needs a 3, but rolls 2: reroll? 2.
Don’t get me wrong, I think that Microsoft has a great product with Windows 7. Their Windows Phone offering is also great, too. However, I’ve been burned by them before — I was a Zune customer. I loved my Zune. Then, support for the darn thing started to dry up, rumors that MS would terminate the device completely started to swell… and sure enough, the Zune is now a distant memory. There’s a good chance the Windows Phone platform could go the way of the Zune in a few years. Perhaps not, but with increased competition from Android and the already dominant iPhone… who knows? Windows 8 on the desktop and at the mobile level may be great, or it may be a flop.
Or injustice of thought,
I really love this skirt. You can't tell in the picture but it has buttons all down the side. I bought the same skirt in a colored tweed when they came out and the black one was only available one size larger so I went ahead and bought it even though I could grab wads of fabric at my hips. I can't believe I would ever be happy at being a size larger or anything but I am soooo glad this skirt still fits. It's truly one of my favorite items in my closet. You can probably tell I have a real affinity for the knee length pencil skirt. Since I am built so straight, I've found I can wear it without "bumps" at my hips as my mom so eloquently says and it actually adds some curves.
The United States, for years, has had people debate the issue of welfare and who is responsible for helping the poor. Some people think that government is responsible to help the poor, others think that it is the job of the poor to somehow help themselves, and still others think that it is the responsibility of the individual to help the poor. The fact of the matter is that it is the job of the Church to provide for the poor. I do not have time to list every reference in scripture where God calls on His people to help the poor, but you can find a pretty good number of these references by clicking here. God never told the Church to let the government handle the poor.
Cons: Nothing happens on Columbus Day. There is no day off, there is no celebration. Really, it does make sense since this holiday is celebrating the fact that an Italian guy couldn’t work a map and compass.
Warm wishes,
Jesse: (Confused.) You did?
So this is pink. Very pink for this 'all about the earthy tones' girl. But I love it, and that's what matters right?!
Giveaway Winner from Last Week
KOLT is quite blessed to have the amazing Lauren Nardozzi back as our SM. We first worked with Lauren in 2008 for our production of Lips, after which she went on San Francisco State and stage managed with Oberlin Dance Collective, San Francisco Friends School and California Shakespeare Theater. We are thrilled that she is back in Sac and privileged to have her SM Where We’re Born as well as Smudge, for which she is an integral component of a very special baby. We asked Lauren for her insights on the current production, KOLT, the Sac theatre scene and stage managing vs acting.
My grandfather didn't believe in doing things by half-measures, and it was real perfume, not cologne. Like the fabled bolt of cloth, it would never run out, for no sooner did my grandmother apply the last precious drop to her skin, than a new bottle would appear nested in its blue velvet box with looping gilt writing: Shalimar.
I'm not scared of that label
“Shit, did you try a museum?”
If we defined “getting ripped” correctly as a process of building muscle and losing fat, then it becomes easier to point out the benefits of “getting ripped”:
But are the German art students being ironic? Is this really a representation of democracy in our world? Does it need to be to be art? Even if it is representative, it begs the question: is it art? Does that make it NOT art?
UniWorld founder Byron Lewis sells stake in agency to new CEO Monique Nelson
"Hahahahaha" (sound of running feet)
for now~ it's time to announce the
And now, moving along to the two winners I know best: SID in Northern Ireland and then Steve in England.
The economists preferred choice, a Pigovian tax might be complicated if the real social costs come from the excessive consumption of cheap alcohol, but that is questionable. What a price floor does do, however, is potentially help out two of the guardians of Britain's pub cluture: pubs and heritage and craft brewers: "The government says a 40p unit price will not add to the price of beer in a pub and might even help the pub trade by eradicating the cheap supermarket alternative."
Damn. How did I get wrapped up in this? Why do I have to choose between being the bad guy in the kid's eyes, or blowing this woman off in front of everyone else in the area who is now watching? What do I do if he tells me no? I can't just snatch him up by the ear like she should have done two minutes ago...
Thank you for reading! Reading Rules!
Now, to his food stores. That’s right, Rasheth brings food into battle with him. On the right of the picture, there’s a small bowl of eyeballs that he’s reaching into. The eyes were painted white, and a few were given pupils to reinforce the grossness of Rasheth eating eyeballs. In the middle is a tray of sushimi, wich I painted white (to simulate the rice), and then a mix of a ruddy flesh and orange on top (to simulate salmon). On the left is a goblet of what you could call wine if you were feeling charitable, but which I painted to look like blood. As an added effect, I brought some red ink up over the lip of the goblet on one side to make it look like Rasheth’s already had a drink.
“Spoiler Alert” by Laura Eve Engel and Adam Peterson
My fifth and final post will be on “The Dead.”
Werbin, Kenneth C. (2009). Fear and No-Fly Listing in Canada: The Biopolitics of the “War on
Flexie:0)
Perhaps the brides and grooms who contact me are very busy. True, they are ... but they weren't too busy to visit my website and fill out my on-line inquiry form!
A user abuses injectable opiates (in the majority of cases, heroin) an average of 14 years before the user admits himself or herself into a treatment program.
1 Tablespoon of Baking Soda
Nicholas Roche (Irl) - Climber and GC hopeful – Son of the well-known Stephen Roche, struggles to get the support he needs sometimes but climbs well. Expect to see him hanging on to the front group in the mountains
“I had not then acquired the technique that I flatter myself now enables me to deal competently with the works of modern artist. If this were the place I could write a very neat little guide to enable the amateur of pictures to deal to the satisfaction of their painters with the most diverse manifestations of the creative instinct. There is the intense ‘By God!’ that acknowledges the power of the ruthless realist, the ‘It’s so awfully sincere’ that covers your embarrassment when you are shown the coloured photograph of an alderman’s widow, the low whistle that exhibits your admiration for the post-impressionist, the ‘Terribly amusing’ that expresses what you feel about the cubist, the ‘Oh!’ of one who is overcome, the ‘Ah!’ of him whose breath is taken away.”
The lifeforce is energy generated by all living things, infused with the living down to the molecular level. The degree to which the lifeforce interacts with a potentially living thing is the difference between being alive or being dead. Yet, even dead creatures that were once alive maintain reserves of this energy for a long time, or their bodies would collapse into a fine powder.
Rob says that the newly re-purposed laundry room has now become his safe place, a room of order where he can go and breath deeply when the chaos of four children and a farm get to him. I am thankful that I have a washer and dryer and room to dance.
PLEASE feel free to share these prayers, individually or as a whole. I’d appreciate if you somehow referenced this blog as where they were found but the only rule is that you credit the writer if you choose to use them in any capacity.
We are not all soulless bastards, in spite of what I’ve already written. Yes, I know I’m all over the place…give me a break.
I hate Melissa Leo's hair. The dress is lovely. She was in Marky Marks movie The Fighter. She's sweet.
I wanted to go through a couple of different burlesque/pinup looks and then cover one fetish/latex set as well, which we did.
I also recently started Isabel Wilkerson’s The Warmth of Other Suns, a beautifully written and highly acclaimed book on the African American Great Migration. I think that it will really help me think about my own research interests in new ways.
I: Now in terms of . . .
The Reapers are the Angels is not so much a book about a Zombie Apocalypse as it is about the living humans left alive afterwards. 25 years ago the world went straight to hell and so for 15 year old Temple - this is the only world she's ever known. Taught not to read and write but to shoot and survive. Carrying with her the memory of her almost-brother Malcolm, Temple encounters groups travelling the country, cities of people attempting to rebuild a civilization and some very strange mutations. Oh. And lets not forget the Zombies. Countless 'slugs' of which Temple has no problems dealing with.
Most of the women to whom I have taught this technique report that the turning occurred not while they were actually going through the movements but later, when they were relaxed, for example (as in the story just quoted) when taking a bath. Do not expect your baby to turn after the first time you try the movements. Repeat it several times each day. Don’t give up. The majority of breech babies will turn eventually. However, we must accept that a few will not, probably because they cannot:
SO, I went to work...slowly but surely...because by this time, my morning sickness from my third pregnancy had kicked in and the thought of doing anything but laying on the couch trying to keep food down, was out of the question.
They all sailed away in that salty old flipper
about what may or may not happen tomorrow.
Karma is not about the reincarnation or rebirth of the individual.
3. You don’t really need to include a plot; the romance element can cunfuse people into thinking you have one.
I love the invitation in verse 19 and verse 20.
It was me and Kate, online on Facebook, hungry and had no one to eat with, it was our off… we decide to meet at Jollibee Mangahan… and off we went to have a sumptuous meal at Dencios… then hung out… then Sam started joining us on our way home, me and Sam get out at the same time–Kate, 30 minutes earlier… and then the next off, it was the UP fair, the same drill… we 3 are hungry and we need good food… we went… and there we were at the middle of Sunken Garden, on the grass, eating Rodic’s Tapsilog–I had bacon–while watching some bands play…
Last week Jor Mom landed in iTunes and this week I AM ON JOR MOM. Which means you could have me in your ears as you drift to sleep at night. Or you could try and save my laugh and use it as your alarm clock.
1092 **D-XI/4/1990. “Mrs. Woolf’s Sixty-three Shillings.” Basic Program Weekend Conference, The University of Chicago, Alpine Valley Resort, East Troy, Wisconsin. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(12), above, pp. 487-503.)
And then we visited a charity shop that was dedicated completely to vintage clothes and items. Here we are all kneeling around a suitcase full of vintage patterns (mostly 60's and 70's). I absolutely love this photo!!!
This weeks challenge will last for 2 weeks because there is no challenge set for Christmas Eve (24th), but there WILL be a challenge on 31st December.
Preheat oven to 190c
Kuvhimadzama
At the top of the allotment is one big wide bed, which is going to be 3 smaller beds for sweetcorn, pumpkins and root crops respectively. I just need to source some wood to make the bed divides, but that might not be done until the end of May or the beginning of June. It looks a bit messy, plenty more preperation needed before the end of the month..
Ecstasy is just one-eighth as harmful as alcohol, despite all its media attention and public concerns.
“Her song Umentyisi condemned the violence inflicted on our people by their colonial masters,” he said.
I hope you enjoy your Sunday.
Presidents’ Day
My mum said to me while we were watching - "but this is so unrealistic. Where will it go? how could it possibly turn into anything? it's just a summer romance". I guess the answer to that is, it doesn't matter, really, does it? It happened, that's enough.
23= Maine
my computer, & open that Skype to see him smile
And by "strange" I mean totally and utterly completely awesome!
Quita Hague, hacked to death….
I blew it, and I knew it.
The decision follows a complaint by a Department of Transport official that the use of her tweets by newspapers constituted an invasion of privacy...
Topsy was fed carrots laced with 460 grams of potassium cyanide before the deadly current from a 6,600-volt AC source was sent coursing through her body, partly as a demonstration of how "unsafe" his competitor's (Nikola Tesla) alternating current design was. She was dead within seconds. The event was witnessed by an estimated 1,500 people and Edison's film of the event was seen by audiences throughout the United States. – Wikipedia
See and love; see, be
This design was hand-painted by Papemelroti designer Robert Alejandro using black and blue fountain pen ink. Incidentally, Robert didn't even use a pencil to outline this design. It just came alive, just like in a real forest!
I don't really consider myself a photographer-- that word seems to imply a certain level of professionalism, and I'm really more the point-and-shoot-and-hope-for-the-best type. But we're going to call this Photography Friday anyway. Because I like alliterative titles. (As you'll see when I debut the other features I've been working on.) And it's only my slightly neurotic need for proper spelling and grammar keeping me from calling it Fotography Friday.
Opening my door I find clean sheets. YEAH! I change them and make the bed and now…I need a shower. I lock the bathroom door, start the shower, realize shampoo and conditioner would be great and turn to open the door.
Make It:
Good blini can be made on a regular stove, primus stove or kerosine stove. To ensure that blin doesn’t get burned, it should be turned from one side to another.
But also gives strength when all else fails!!!
Thirdly, many of the earliest arguments levelled against American media/cultural imperialism (dating back to the 1960s and 1970s) frequently ignored how international audiences responded to, or appropriated, American media content. Since the late 1970s and early 1980s, this academic oversight has been substantially redressed through the emergence of cultural studies (particularly as practised and popularised in the UK) as an academic discipline. Yet while cultural studies has paid considerable attention to national and international audience responses to popular music, television and cinema, practitioners in this field have historically shown comparatively less interest in popular print culture – such as magazines, paperback novels, fan publications, or comic books – and their readerships. While this trend has undergone a welcome, albeit gradual reversal, studies of comic-book reading practices, and of comic-book readers and collectors, remain relatively few (There does, however, seem to be more activity in this area concerning the reception of Japanese manga and anime, and its regional Asian equivalents, amongst Western audiences). This study of international fan communities of The Phantom will, I hope, add new insights to current academic thinking and knowledge about comic books and their audiences.
Though here we move about
All this New Blogger Initiative stuff has reminded me of one of the common pithy bits of supposed “wisdom” that I’ve heard since junior high, when “inspirational” speakers try to tell us good little empty-headed starry-eyed students what to do with our lives and careers. Perhaps you’ve heard this one before?
Jack Wallbank ‎*Scratch*
Sometimes I think I need to remember the things that are truly important.
Hops: Bravo & Willamette
gorgoroth - 2007 galpon victor jara, santiago, chile 20.09.2007) 2 cam mix
“We’re out beyond Nursim. I went walking in these hills a few times when I went there for training.” She frowned, her eyes flicking down to her hands and back to his. “There’s no Sherim nearer here than ours.”
I haven't been to a Carol service in far too long and who doesn't love to sing a little at Christmas?
We will overnight in Nieu Bethesda, a one donkey town in the Eastern Cape. It is famous entirely due to the obsession of Helen Martins, an artist of dubious merit. She embarked on a project to fill her property with concrete sculpturess. Owls, camels and people and stuff. All set out in scenes that made sense to her. The job completed in her 70′s, she committed suicide.
Tune in tomorrow for your next freebie...
I was thinking about all of this as I stepped outside this morning, feeling the strange coolness in the air, the dew under my bare feet in the grass, the peppery scent of the muscadines ripening on the vines. As I reached out and touched a purple flower springing from the weeds in our garden, I felt a strange calm pass through me. I listened as a prayer formed in my brain, all by itself.
Subject: Re: Reply to Collectors Quest
I love the cream in their puffs, I love the serving size which is bigger than the usual cream puff and bigger than the usual pizza slice. I didn’t like how super chewy the outside was to the point that I was fighting a bit with my food. It wasn’t a huge struggle to eat them but my expectation was set by the menu board and their poster so I thought they were really going to be crispy on the outside. I’ll give them the benefit of the doubt though, because it was just soft opening and a lot of things aren’t really upto standard when restaurants are in their soft opening. I’ll definitely give them a another try especially that their shop, so far, offers the most number of cream puff flavors I’ve ever seen in one shop.
What I won’t be doing is discussing this book with my mother. Okay, perhaps the secret to a happy marriage, but not the naughty bits. I don’t prohibit my mother from reading this book, I just don’t want to talk to her about it.
So Mom is way upset, something bout we don't got no
Female gamers and game-creators have been a topical theme as of late. While the recent attention is great, it is quite frankly long overdue, considering that according to a study conducted by the Entertainment Software Association, over 40% of online game players are women and over 46% of game purchasers are female.
State: Hanging out with the Misses
Anyhow, my hair has been total frump lately. It's long grown out of it's cut and shape, and since it STILL won't curl (except for a few stubborn corkscrew curls at my temples) I have to straighten it and the ends have been all dry and yucky, and, well, this is where my sister comes in. Her name is Sarah (I call her Stott) and she is a hairdresser with artistic vision.
So silly
Jim Simpson
However I give this book a ‘good’ rating and think that it worth a read if you are interested in further understanding younger adult’s perspective on the church and faith.
In other words, Britain and many countries in Europe are going to find out what it is like to live as Israel has lived since its rebirth in 1948. Britain is going to find out that being hated by Islam it is not because of territory, of occupation, or of settlements, but rather more simply because its indigenous inhabitants are not of the Islamic faith and must therefore be converted, dominated, or killed.
However, I know another author whose book has been in print for quite a few years. It may soon go out of print. Under a standard contract, if a book is out of print for two years, all rights return to the author. So, for example, Malcolm Hardee’s autobiography I Stole Freddie Mercury’s Birthday Cake was out of print for two years and now 100% of all rights have reverted to me and to the estate of the late Malcolm.
I also wanted to let you know about Wayfair’s "Pin It to Win It:: Dream Nursery" Pinterest Contest for a chance to win $200 in Wayfair rewards. I'm excited too because I love Pinterest and will be judging the finalists! If you are just starting to design a nursery or simply adding the finishing touches, this is a great opportunity!
Apple blossom rosy pink and white
This book is not a stand alone novel so you will have to read the other novels to get the full story. What Zaina is saving the world from is not uncovered in this first book, nor are the specifics of the prophecy. Hopefully, the reader will discover these answers in books two and three.
A new stage in his life had begun.
To get started you will need:
Great night…. 5 standing O’s……there are so many good performers left…. and at least 5 or 6 could be winners. There are so many styles and genres represented.
Tanstaafl, I think you are being very fair here. I myself am losing patience with Auster’s refusal to respond to points of view that he perceives as being to the Right of himself. I sent him a comment a few days ago in which I asked why, if blacks were an unassimilable minority, he didn’t advocate separating from them. It seems like he has a double standard in which new minorities (Hispanics, Muslims) are intolerable, but the influence of old minorities has to be tolerated, no matter how negative it is. You have suggested a reason why: he fears that Jews wouldn’t be tolerated either. So you’re right that this is a serious weakness in his thinking.
Smoked Mackerel with pickled Samphire and lemon dressing
So before he wrote much, he started to doze
Note the distance between their bodies, the side kiss, the near grimace of Michelle Obama, how stiff the shoulders and arms of the president appear. (Steve Urkel anyone?) Trouble in paradise? Certainly there have been whispers and the occasional speculative news reports of such. No photo yet though has so clearly captured the seeming truth of such speculation. It is the kind of kiss most often seen given unwillingly by suffering children to the odd and strange smelling older family member during the holidays.
I will leave you with a photo of Example from Friday:
If I disappeared… would you notice? Would you care?
Remember to bring your University and state-issued ID!
That left him with a quandary; if he used his remaining Clearsight now, he'd be unable to watch Taslin, but without it the fight would be a much harder proposition. In theory it was possible to fight a Gift-Giver with Clearsight, but no-one had ever tried. The Stable Rod bucked in his hand as it tried to bleed off the strain of their approach.
So either Tuscon is deaf, or that’s exactly the sort of pernicious liberal talk they need to yank from their children’s hands (by some accounts, the books were literally yanked from students in their classrooms.) So it’s not just ethnic studies that’s getting the sword edge. Alexie, Diaz, and Allende are joined by such race-obsessed monomaniacs as Henry David Thoreau and William Shakespeare.
· Like human food, avoid excessive salt, sugar, and dyes.
I have to run my tidy bowl man has called in OSHA, I’m out of chips, the groundhog just rang the bell asking for aspirin and I have to find an extra garden hose.
Things are somewhat okay.
Adventure tour in Ladakh is another thing apart from scenic beauty & stunning landscapes which makes Leh Ladakh popular all over the world. Adventure enthusiast tourists from all over the world book Ladakh packages to do some adventurous and thrilling activities. Tourist will find here a lot of opportunities and facilities for adventure sports in this arid region. Tourists can enjoy different adventurous activities in Leh Ladakh, such as white water rafting, camel safari, frozen river trekking, mountain trekking, bike safari, cycling, jeep safari, yak safari, mountain climbing, river crossing, wildlife watching etc..
I was so excited and truly touched when I saw she started this blog. Excited because I think she rules and touched because she has a truly incredible story to tell.
Boss, a loner, loved to dive derelict spacecraft adrift in the blackness of space. But one day, she found a ship that would change everything–an ancient Dignity Vessel–and aboard the ship, the mysterious and dangerous Stealth Tech. Now, years after discovering that first ship, Boss has put together a large company which finds Dignity Vessels and finds “loose” stealth technology.
The weekend began with Grace's softball game on Friday night and we were able to watch her pitch for the very first time. She did a great job and really enjoyed pitching. It was so fun to have her family watch her play and cheer her on. She was thrilled that her cousin Owen and uncle Ry Ry could join us, as well as Aunt Nora, Uncle Lenny, Aunt Kerri and Uncle Mark. Jamma and Poppy came in a few days early to help us get ready for all of the festivities!
For a chance to win, visit Lifebooker (and consider signing up), and leave a comment below. A reader will be chosen at random tomorrow. Good luck! xo Update: Janet P. is our lucky winner. Thanks for playing.
were a shifting barrier island between
I took my daughter to Liverpool for an orthodontist appointment today.
Pro-life groups say that the research by EPA adds to an increasing body of evidence implicating the use of aborted fetal cell material in the nationwide vaccinations impacting nearly every child born in the United States.
On a lighter note…It’s fourth of july weekend! YAY! As I write this I already feel the anxiety as to how much I am going to eat and what it is I will eat.
A variety of practitioners, primarily European, have sought to popularize iridology since these early works. Dr. Bernard Jensen, a chiropractor, is the best-known contemporary American advocate of iridology.
I know that ultimately, I will not be working there forever, it is just a matter of when the job ends, not if. People tell me I should quit but this is where I have my health insurance and frankly, I don't know if I am up to starting a new job right now.
As a model or actress or star
it to her after all, and not to worry. But he replied to me sadly. 'No, Santa Claus can't bring it to her
Images: Trust everyone enjoyed the weekend. We had a very busy one. Had eight guests round for a formal dinner Saturday night ( first course pictured above). Added the final touches to a painting I've been working on for a few months ( see above piece).
Twisted X Senor Viejo
The biggest problem I have encountered with work is the question of earning money for it. Most of the jobs I have held are paid on a commission basis -- not the hourly basis most people are used to. When I was a freelance writer for brighthub.com, I was paid $15-25 per article, plus money for pageviews. As a musician, I'm paid per gig. If I win a writing contest or sell a story/poem, I'm paid for each sale or award. If I was a professional actor or theatre worker, I'd be paid per show I worked on. When I babysit, I am paid by the hour, but that's the only hourly-wage job I've held to date.
Let’s go back to Cebu incident. In the same ABS-CBN report Willard Cheng wrote: President Aquino is considering using Malacañan sa Sugbo in Cebu if only to meet a partner in life.
So let's begin.............
Well. WELL. You would have though I threw a slushie in her face or something, because she quit book group! Not only did she quit book group, but she emailed everyone in book group BUT ME to tell them she was quitting. Have I somehow gotten lost in some Sweet Valley High time warp? Don't grown ups just tell each other when they are angry and discuss the situation? Or perhaps I should post passive aggressive Facebook status updates about all of this? And. AND. She did not even read the book! OMG, right?
Steve Rogers: Hulk? Smash!
we are opening the CAMP WANDAWEGA SOUVENIR SHOP.
In decorating- nothing can be more stylish than a Stripe & it's probably the most democratic of all fabrics.
Accessories, etc.: Several circle punches.
What exactly is Trunk’d Clothing and how can you benefit? These are great questions and I hope that after this blog people will have a better understanding and can see how amazing we really are. Have you ever been to a party at a friend’s house and someone came in to show you all the cool kitchen gadgets that you need for home or a line of jewelry? This is called a direct sales approach and there are all different kinds of companies out there that sell anything from vitamins to financial instruments.
Former Cooley director Willie McArthur, now working in a marketing role for Beam -- producers of the Jim Beam bourbon brand -- said the own-label sellers were unwitting victims of the "runaway" success of Irish whiskey.
The Kroger Family of Stores 1-800-632-6900
And so together they wove their way back to the sleepy village, with a million
lie strewn dilapidated washers & sinks
"Shut UP! Is this an April Fool's joke?" He assured me it was not, and that I could look up the phone number and call him back and he'd verify it in reverse. I was to go to my favorite County Market on Philo Road in a week and pick up my loot!
Damart also caters for a huge size range, and on all underwear you have a no time limit, lifetime guarantee, no questions asked. Quite a tall order in this day and age.
Question 1 is from Robert at Plead Ignorance: "If you could live your life over again, what would you do differently and what would remain unchanged?"
For Saturday and Sunday, I just wrote. It was nice. I finished a contest (see previous post) but I don’t want to lose momentum. Now that my life is matching my previous aspirations, reading and writing have become easier and more interesting for me.
These crunchy, dipping cookies are spiced with loads (I'm not kidding when I say "loads") of cardamom, ginger, and cinnamon. In short, they are Chi-warming, to say the least. Their nutty flavor is enhanced by almond meal as well as crunchy almonds. I really enjoy them with hot tea because they stay crunchy. You also could serve them with frozen desserts (especially some rich and decadent homemade non-dairy vanilla cream).
The whole experience has, however, given me a genuine love of the Wetherspoon ethos. Long may they thrive. I know Mr Hamburger would agree – since his genealogical mystery has more than once name-checked The Brass Balance in Birkenhead, which I know was always a particular favourite of his.
These cookies have an amazing kick of sweet heat from the pink peppercorns. I liked them best with the extra jam. They have that " shortbread" texture- buttery and crumbly, with a crisp yet soft bite. The dough is super easy to handle and rolls perfect for all cutout shapes, with almost no spreading or puffing. No sticking or extra flour needed.
You are so driven. That can be a blessing and a curse:) You set a goal and then work to pass it. You are super motivated. This is a huge blessing to me, but it is also something I worry about. You are so determined to to be your best, that the times you are not your best, you are SO hard on yourself. Much harder than your Abba and I would ever be. I pray every single day that you would understand that our love, and God's love, is not connected to how happy you make us or how disappointed we are. You were loved before you did a thing and you will be loved no matter what you do. I pray every single day, multiple times a day, that that truth will sink in. Being so driven is a wonderful thing, but my hope is that you know that you are loved completely no matter what you accomplish.
ANYHOO, Bryce and Idiot Friend wasted no time in picking a target, namely literally the first thing they saw when the looked out the window. As anyone who's ever been given a BB gun for Christmas by a reckless uncle knows, ultimate power like this demands to be exercised immediately.
“I think that would be best. Should I sit down?”
I purchase a
I know this asking a lot, but I do want America to stand up and take our country back and end this Cronyism. Send the message we do not allow the power struggle to be tilted unfairly, if nothing else! Let's put the "U" back in U.S.A and unite to vote Dr. Ron Paul into Presidency. We blew it in 2008, like my boy pointed out, but we still have a chance now. We tried it your way this term, can we try mine now? I don't expect you to take my word for it though. Research it, evaluate the evidence of him, do your homework. Go watch some YouTube videos. Liberty means CHOICES. If they remove that choice, there is no liberty. Its time to choose...Liberty!
These originally started out as cookies but I decided to carry on experimenting and make it a tray bake but small drops on a tray would probably be nice and would take a lot less cooking.
Most people have a salary or a set income. I however do not. I can’t just budget a set amount each month under my income and then “walk away” only looking at my expenses each month. Because my income fluctuates from month to month just like my expenses, I have to look back at this part of my budget as well. Aside from my paycheck fluctuating, I have many other forms of income causing it to fluctuate as well. Even if you are a salaried employee and your paycheck is the same each month, don’t forget to factor in other items you could consider as income.
She says how the crew felt so bad that I came there just for a roast beef sandwich, and they didn't have it, and so as a group they made the decision to give me the shake for free.
Julie Berebitsky is professor of history and director of the Women’s Studies Program at Sewanee: The University of the South. She is the author of Like Our Very Own: Adoption and the Changing Culture of Motherhood.
Stamp : Ali Edwards for Technique Tuesday
But it is a mistake, bringing the book into District 1! I find myself wishing I could bring the book to the table; ignore President Mud, something I have done far too often since he turned four, and I hit a wall with The Games.
(206) 221-6129
Not only did He heal her, but the text goes on to say that as evening came (and no doubt, as word spread through town about Jesus), they brought to him many who were sick and those who were demon possessed and He healed all who were ill.
“Don’t think. We’re ramming it down your throat. We just need the job done urgently!”
Now on to my cards!
This is going to be a short post since I'm writing this on less then two hours sleep because I thought it was a good idea to stay up late to watch the playoffs. How about Halladay? What a game he had!
And finally my Saturday list:
PS: I added a recipe index, as much for my use as for yours, as well as a page with some photos from my travel. I didn't do an "about me," as blogger suggests because, well, don't the posts say it all?
Coming again, to save the mother fucking day yeah,
My lawyer explained that to legally address the copyright infringement with the printed tote bags being sold, we had to address the book in question as well because the image that was used on the tote bag was taken from a close-up photograph of my copyrighted work — graphic designs, clearly recognizable and not transformed — and was published and distributed for sale without permission from me, the copyright owner.
Many thanks to all who participated, and especially to Kelli Russell Agodon at The Book of Kells, for coordinating this fun event. Come back next April for the 2013 giveaway, and keep reading poetry!
“By Him in Whose Hands my soul is! Were it not for some man amongst the believers who dislike to be left behind me, and whom I cannot provide with means of conveyance, I would certainly never remain behind any Sariya (army unit) going out for Jihad in Allah’s Cause. By Him in Whose Hands my life is! I would love to be martyred in Allah’s Cause and then come back to life and then be martyred and then come back to life again and then be martyred and then come back to life again and then be martyred. ” (Sahih AlBukhari, Vol 4, Hadith No.54).
- Antral by Sumit Gunjan and Arvind in education
What is everybody doing nowadays? Yes, recording all those precious memories for the future. Are you? Well I know my family is, everything from those first baby steps, the first Christmas, your favorite memories of your parents, the dog, the girl or guy next door. What about that guy doing a funny walk around the swimming pool who looks just like Charlie Chaplin in those old films?
I haven't posted any projects on here for a while, we have been on quite a journey this past month. We moved to a new state, delivered/lost our baby boy...and everything that goes in between. Things are settling down just a bit, and I thought I would post some pictures of our new home. I LOVE it! I call it our cottage.
12. Help Me Make It Through the Night
Except after I’d changed, rolled out my yoga mat, and located my hand weights, I realized the DVD is missing.
"I feel it isn't fair," Mike said. "I'm basically being judged to pay something that isn't mine."
I just need it to get me five miles today.
ASIA
Nov 2011 - Air Force Vs. Army Football Game
And we had another awesome week in Paradise. The tot was in school, the Hubs was off work for a couple of days and what does the Mommy want more? Nothing, nada, nixinixnix. Ok, a little sunshine would have been nice too, but we managed without.
“The greatest impact is whether the employees have a decent job satisfaction level, feel appreciated, and whether they can get information from the boss – which is not necessarily the same as employees having a say – but getting information about plans for the workplace that will affect the employee, be it financial information or otherwise,” Professor Markey said.
5. Slice the apple, dipping each slice lemon or lime juice on both sides to keep it from browning. (This is a good way to use less than perfect looking organic apples). Use a mandoline if you can or just try to get some nice even slices, not like I did here.
I don't know for others, but I know for me,
Property rights, self determination and freedom of association are the liberties at stake. Rescind mine now, and you place your own in future jeopardy.
SPIDER and DEAD BOY TALKING.
ESQUIRE
Look at my little car, imagine it’s a bus, and don’t walk the fuck in front of it.
The Pinacoteca is a large neo-classical building with large open spaces and so much art on the walls we had never seen before, of course we were only thirteen and fourteen years of age. Each art piece amused us in some ways or another while teachers were making efforts in keeping us attentive to their explanations and comments on the beautiful art pieces. We arrived in front of Lucio Fontana’s paintings and we were abruptly silenced at the view of sliced up canvases, at least that’s what we thought they were.
Everybody knows the Queen Mother is dead, they said at the trial, but I didn’t know she was the Queen then, did I? And it was the sick mother bit that got me too. I always go that bit extra to help customers. Plus it was a question of pride. I wanted to show that buses were better than trains.
"We should do that," I told him. "It sounds gorgeous. Plus we probably will be tired from all the temples. A river would be a nice distraction."
No one should not let oneself "get" arrested. There is nothing sexy, useful, or sacrificial about doing so. It is a waste of legal fees, time, and zip ties, and it renders protest recognizable in an old-fashioned, familiar, and therefore irrelevant way. (And not "old-fashioned" in the Barcelona 1936 way, for example, which would be quite another story.)
In a Blueshirt, his fights have been quite unimpressive to say the least. Derek is out of playing shape. In plain speak he is fatter and getting sloppier. He is tiring faster in fights and skating slower.
We've had a lovely weekend, hot and humid ending a hot week of Autumn sunshine!
Without forgiveness there is only punishment.
On my previous post, I stated that I would expound more on my personal political ideology. As mentioned, I identify myself as a Libertarian. What does this really mean? Well, I also mentioned that I’m no political science expert but I think I can defend my views even though I’m not an intellectual heavyweight.
Audition by Barbara Walters
...There is no evidence that she ever spoke of her relationship with Smith. Secondhand sources suggest that Smith denied committing adultery with Alger, but did not deny a relationship.
Leaving the house at 6, getting to the hospital at 7, operation scheduled to begin at 8.
embrace this suffocation
Ultimate Fighting Champions and Mixed Martial Artists are fighting outside the ring these days, to help local veterans in need – especially those who recently returning from Iraq and Afghanistan.
at IHM.
Left Hand Brewing Co. is located in Colorado, so we don't normally see their offerings available around here. Lucky for us Martin at St. James Beverage has connections.
7:45pm – Halftime Entertainment, Eagletag and Skills Challenge
And – now that a mountain-range of emails has been ‘rediscovered’ by Murdoch’s IT team – there will almost certainly be e’s to and from him, both confirming that assertion and incriminating shoals of Murdoch journalists. The Slog will be asking lots of questions should the Met’s investigator Sue Akers and her chaps not press charges against the recipients of Whittamore’s largesse: for having sent the monkey to jail, it does seem a little strange to pardon the organ-grinders.
Exhibit B…
Merry Christmas Eve,
Father’s hard work paid off and he was promoted. Jubilantly, he decided to hire a maid to relieve his wife from her domestic tasks. He also felt that their three-room flat was no longer big enough, it would be nice for his family to be able to enjoy the facilities and comfort of a condominium. Having experienced the rewards of his hard work many times before, Father resolved to further his studies and work at being promoted again. The family still did not get to see much of him. In fact, sometimes Father had to work on Sundays entertaining clients. Again, whenever the family complained that he was not spending enough time with them, he reasoned that he was doing all this for them. But he often yearned to spend more time with his family.
As the article notes, it has yet to be published within peer reviewed research journals.
A collaborative resource planning program can surely improve manager efficiency. When the scheduling manager for a business spends less time producing a schedule, because the computer program automatically fills in shifts, then the manager will devote more time to revenue-generating activity. A manager may provide coaching to employees, serve customers, or complete an outstanding project, instead of endlessly poring over schedule spread sheets.
Scott is sick and the girls had fevers, that quickly went away. Just lots of crankiness! I do NOT like crankiness! Probably because I have so much of it!
The Rabbit Hunters, Pedro Costa, Portugal. Documentary, 22 min.
If you're looking for a fun, engaging, heart warming story that teaches great lessons pick this one up! And the best part is, you don't need to have read the other series before reading it. All of Neta's series though intertwined are completely readable on their own! Each has a different set of main characters and the characters that are in the other series are explained well enough you know all you need to about them! I highly, highly recommend this book along with any of her others!
As soon as they saw the Bible I faithfully carried with me everywhere, the conversation was over before it ever began. So I put my Bible away for a while and began to listen.
Your finances are no different. You must put effort into your budget if you hope to live a financially prosperous life.
4. The First Noel
For more info, please email Rina at sfinsfevents@gmail.com.
Green Chili Dip
Interestingly I found the Munster generally served younger than I would have expected presumably because of its pungent smell. The one exception was at the Taverne Alsacienne at Ingersheim where they serve a younger and more artisanal version (right) together. Needless to say the latter was the one I liked best.
Anise Squash Soup
I see the revolution on the streets everyday because I live in the town of Rio Piedras, the epicenter of the revolution and home to the University of Puerto Rico. Thing is that for the longest time, higher education in Puerto Rico was extremely cheap, and the masses, the poor, were getting too smart for their own good. The powers that be have taken notice and now they want to make it difficult for the poor or medium class to get themselves educated. So they’ve raised tuition prices. Of course, the students are going to protest, this means that their lives will get more difficult, some won’t be able to pay the new higher tuition. So the students have started strikes that paralyze the whole university. In retaliation, the government has sent the police force to take over the university, and naturally, tensions are escalating. Day by day I wonder if things will eventually blow up in an ugly way, with possible blood shed. Cops are taking students that are speaking up against the violence and putting them in black vans and taking them away.
In addition to Twirl the fragrance, there's also a whole Twirl collection, that includes sequins, baubles, bows, and even the perfect red lipstick! Everything a girl needs to prepare for the upcoming holiday season. (I can't believe I just said that!) Check out the video that screams New Year's Eve!
I’ve been having real trouble this week feeling very alert and for some reason it carried over to this morning although I’m usually very excited an ready to go on our Saturday adventures. In the true, strict dictionary definition of the word I think I’ve been depressed which is simply that I’ve been foggy, without the usual energy, lethargic and mellow. I don’t actually feel sad, just tired and all too ready to lie down. (That’s the funny thing about working from home — if you want to lie down (on the sofa) on the job, you can! But you still have to work and I tend to work longer than usual because I don’t have to commute and I tend to work while eating. I’m really hoping that our trip next week to the Orkneys will help alleviate some of that since I can rest on the way up and down, plus it’s something I’ve wanted to do ever since my 4th grade class read A Stranger Came Ashore (although that as set in the Shetlands, I say it counts).
He is the Living (One) (huwa al-hayyu): There is no god but He: Call upon Him, giving Him sincere devotion. Praise be to God, Lord of the Worlds! … S. 40:65, 68 Y. Ali
Discussing the Divine Comedy with Dante
To learn more, consider attending one of the public information meetings being held this month to review the Halton District School Board’s Long-Term Accommodation Plan. A meeting for Oakville is scheduled for 7:00 PM on Tuesday, February 23 at Abbey Park High School.
“Abandoned all hope, all ye who enter here.” - that’s the inscription on the gates of hell according to Dante. It’s the inscription on the gates of infidelity according to me.
There is a man I have been working with for the last week, and he is on a schedule to be ambulated atleast 300+ feet a day. Nobody every followed through and helped ambulate him. Slowly leading to him degenerating into a weaker and weaker state progressively.
I’m thinking this whole thing was one huge Diet Coke conspiracy trying to lure me back in.
The third person to join our group was Edrian Thomidis. We'd met through a number of Illustration critique groups, SCBWI and forums. I was always impressed with her ability to infuse her work with raw emotion and personal experience. Her illustrations focus on the strength and love of family. You can tell the difference between someone who is drawing something they know nothing about and someone who has experienced something physically and emotionally and are able to translate that to paper. Edrian has that magic. Edrian is the multi-talented, intelligent and wisest member of our group. Little did I know how strong a personality and business sense she possessed. She has an amazing talent for looking at the bigger picture and making sure we stay on track with our goals and purpose. She is never without an idea or vision of how to make things better and expand on the technical or non-conventional obstacles we come across that we hadn't expected. It was an honor to have her agree to be a part of this! The group wouldn't be complete without her!
Oddly enough, I started playing hacky-sack right around this time, and couldn’t help but think about the sacred ball game. But that’s something else entirely.
Braid the hair and sit under the dryer. The bigger the braid, the deeper the wave; smaller braids produce more of a crinkly look. Sit under the dryer until the braids are fully dry.
We may not agree with the student strike and its cause, but we have to acknowledge that, in an orderly way, our young ones are standing for their rights, or perceived rights, and are rejecting the scums that pretend to sympathise with them but are only doing a disservice to their cause.
While I am liberal I have honestly tried my best to keep some balance to my political viewpoint figuring that no ideology has all the answers. However, if the business classes want to define anyone who questions their omnipotent knowledge and religion of unrestrained capitalism as “anti-American” I will have to state for the record that I accept that title. I seriously doubt I have any more conservative readers at my humble blog but if my declared Anti-American stance offends you please feel free to kiss my pale, hairy ass. Just understand that one day you will have to pay the price for putting money and power above your humanity.)
Reduce heat and add garlic and ginger.
Happy2host
Once we met up with my parents and brother in Heerenveen, we were on a Mission…. To the Lighthouse! Whoops, I mean … to the Windmill!
To finish it, place a corn cake on the plate with some pork and gravy over top of it. Garnish with a little parsley, and voila! A simple and fun way to use up some leftovers.
thank you all for the warm thoughts and wishes. you know, you complain about life from time to time and then something shows you that moments are perfect. last night was one of those. i've had a rough week, nothing bad, but i felt worn around the edges. and then, last night on a whim i called a friend for dinner. turns out she had a rough week too. so we had a great little dinner and a drink and then wandered over for coffee. then my sister called and i was invited with her to another friend's home for a st. patrick's day meal.
10) Pervert
Speaking of milk, did you know it takes 345 squirts from Bessie's udder to make one gallon of milk? I'd be curious to meet the Adonis who gets paid to run these studies.
(b) to fulfill the social, economic and other requirements of present and future generations of Filipinos and;
Worried about the greasy oily feeling of Argan oil ? This oil is non greasy and quickly absorbed. You can actually use it morning and night. Just carry a small spritzer bottle in your purse and you can use it on the go. I'm always looking for that idea product that's easy to use and convenient too. If you're looking to take a few years off, and who isn't, never under estimate the effects of a great oil. Your hair, face, hands and skin will thank you for it and after all aren't we all looking for a little magic potion? Don't we all love to hide our age?
Not dinner.
With any species that we add to our educational programs and demonstrations, the first challenge is to identify behaviors that are unique or particularly interesting that can be utilized to teach. The obvious behavior with these small owls is their fondness for tunneling. Eventually, we will have a network of tunnels in a variety of locations for the owl to navigate, but the first step was to familiarize her with the tunnels we would use as well as the reward associated with passing through the tunnel. Video 2 shows her cruising the tunnel. It took less than 5 minutes to train this behavior initially and now she wants nothing more than to run through the tunnel!
Authorities say tax fraud is a low-risk, high-reward criminal enterprise.
This excerpt illustrates perfectly what Whedon and Goddard find frustrating about modern horror: a blood thirst and immunity to physical horror, which perpetuates mutilation-driven movies like the Saw films and Final Destination series.
So if you're any where near the South West of Scotland this weekend, there's a visual feast to be had.
Slapping characters with flaws gives the author something to work with. As the hero strives to overcome whatever the plot throws at him, he can be literally tripped-up by his inability to properly tie his shoes. Perhaps he must overcome his fear of snakes to save Marion before the cave collapses or use his inhaler to continue the chase after the bad guys who kidnapped his daughter.
You went into the restaurant between lunch and dinner service dressed appropriately, resume and knives in hand. For a week you've been reading the menu on-line, and bringing yourself up to speed on the background of the chef and the restaurant itself. After your chat with the chef, you let him know that you're ready to stage that evening if he would like. He tells you to come back Friday instead. On Friday you show up early, smiling and introducing yourself to any staff that you come across. You take your knives and a spoon out of your kit that you slimmed down a bit, and settle in with any prep work that they'll give you--herb picking, cutting bread, citrus supremes. You work quietly and cleanly, with eyes and ears open so you dont miss a thing. Unless:
In her talented hands, a motif might become a bookmark, a bookmark an edging- and virtually anything could be improved with the addition of tatting. I greatly appreciated her support of my designs and I loved seeing her interpretations and the final outcome.
During the invasion of Iraq (March-April 2003), Global Research published, on a daily basis, independent reports from the Middle East, which provided an alternative to the news emanating from the “embedded” journalists reporting from the war theater. Since 2004, Global Research has provided detailed analysis and coverage of US-NATO-Israel preparations to wage a pre-emptive nuclear attack on Iran.
Ray Brassier is a member of the philosophy faculty at the American University of Beirut, Lebanon. He is the author of Nihil Unbound: Enlightenment and Extinction (Palgrave Macmillan 2007).
Oh dear, what should I say?
Autofocus
Left her with the light in the arms of Alblackica over a skyline dotted with the ceremonial stars
miracles today – not because we deserve them, but because You are merciful. So,
Do you know that “fashion design” is a profession real designers study for years? They learn about the material, color studies, draw and sew with their own hands! To be frank I doubt you would recognize a sewing machine if it danced naked in front of you wearing one of “your” bikinis…
But being a shrewd old sociopath, Rupert Murdoch knows that this will simply make his negotiations with BSkyB shareholders even more of an uphill struggle. Reports from Slog sources are suggesting the 61% majority owners want £11 a share at least. Newscorp’s initial offer was £8. That’s a big difference: where is the Old Boy going to find 38% more cash?
Not wanting to be left behind by Stanford and MIT, Harvard is rushing to join the free online course revolution.
We had a huge debate about food. I wanted poptarts and he, being a chef, would not allow me to eat such garbage. He wanted to actually make some real food, like wings or ribs, but I decided in our state that that would not be such a good idea. This was a hilarious walk to his place, mind you, arguing about food. When we got to his place, we decided to make nachos. Only, he actually grilled the tortillas and made me mix up some salsa and cheese. We ate and watched an episode of The Office before we went to his room.
Officers also seized £1,413 cash from her handbag and purse and another £245 from the car, pending an investigation.
1 involved
-Raspberry Ribbon Slices
Suppose now that the psychopathic sex addict leads a life of overt sleaziness with his new partner. Tired of the more virtuous kind of partner from whom he must hide his true identity with all its addictions, sadism and perversions, he transitions to a partner who not only tolerates, but also gladly participates in the sleaze. Suppose they see themselves as being ahead of conventional morality; as libertine mavericks who don’t follow moral norms like sheep (see my previous article on The Psychopath as Self-Proclaimed Maverick).
Long ago on that indoor range, over the hours, we practiced what's called the 'Harries method'. This involves holding the flashlight in the off-hand, across the shooters body, and resting the pistol to the left of the flashlight (for right handed shooters), with the wrist of the hand gripping the pistol laying on top of the other wrist. In the olden days, when all flashlights had their switch on the body in the traditional place, the Harries method called for an uncomfortable positioning of the off hand upside down, so the thumb could activate the switch. While difficult to describe, a few images will make the method clear. Here is the Harries method, adapted to a rear switched flashlight:
Just loved being with family.
I dearly missed my family and the traditions of home, but had a blast here in Ghana. My partner, Sean, courageously joined me from Canada and we go to explore some of the southern regions of Ghana. We first travelled to the Volta Region – full of jungle-covered mountains, hidden waterfalls, banana trees and monkeys. It reminded me of Vancouver and its mountains that I miss so much. For the second half of the holidays, we travelled back west, through Accra and on to Cape Coast. Cape Coast is home to white-sand beaches, fishing villages, fifteenth century forts (later used for the slave trade) and canopy walks. We were joined by the rest of the EWB staff that were still in Ghana for the holidays to celebrate the beginning of 2012 together on the beach.
Saturday, September 22:
JT - But you’re saying that the punishment for administration should be severe?
- Stick it in the mail by December 5th so it doesn't arrive late!
So, I'm thinking I might need a more objective eye. Someone who doesn't care quite so much about ruining my life when they tell me I wrote one craptastic pile of, well, crap. Someone like you, bloggy friend that I've never met.
Mrs Winterson dominates the first half of the book, as she dominated Jeanette’s life (I’m using her first name not to sound cosy but to prevent a blizzard of Wintersons from blocking up my sentences). She dominated, yes, because she was large: ”she loomed up. She expanded. Only later, much later, too late, did I understand how small she was to herself.” The tone and intention is not mocking or disdainful. Jeanette wants to understand Mrs Winterson, with her contradictions, eccentricities (“two sets of false teeth, and a revolver in the duster drawer”) and infectious misery. To Mrs Winterson, the universe was a “cosmic dustbin”, and it seems to Jeanette that her religious attachment to an Old Testament God was a manifestation of her fear of happiness. ”She thought that happy meant bad/wrong/sinful. Or plain stupid. Unhappy seemed to have virtue attached to it.” The battle between her and her mother, Jeanette says, was between happiness and unhappiness. Reading the book, and in particular the later sections which disclose her violence towards her girlfriends, failed relationships, breakdown and suicide attempt, one could hardly consider this devotee of happiness an untroubled soul. Then again it is not happiness she argues for, but the pursuit of it. The chase is the aim.
Hazem Abu Ismail was disqualified because his mother had dual Egyptian-US nationality, violating rules laid out in a constitutional declaration approved after an uprising forced President Hosni Mubarak to step down.
Tebow isn’t the first athlete to be lifted above his apparent capacities by his beliefs. The phenomenon is hardly restricted to Evangelicals. Back in 2005 a Pakistani cricket batsman named Yousuf Youhana converted from Catholicism to Islam. The next season his batting average soared to 83.06 from 47.30. Whenever he scored 100 runs, he kneeled in the direction of Mecca and prostrated himself to Allah. He broke the world record for most test runs in a calendar year.
“We will launch the 4G LTE service in Bangalore this month, followed by Pune and Chandigarh,” Bharti Airtel Chairman Sunil Mittal said.
I've been off track in my organizing and not keeping this blog up to speed. Vacations and life craziness have gotten in the way, and I need to get back on the wagon.
So I say this to anyone who is made to feel like they don’t belong, or made to feel like they can’t succeed: Yes. You can.
¼ cup granulated sugar
oh & there's a photo
Need to pick up passport today.
We all get angry, mad, or upset. Sometimes all three! How parents confront these feelings inevitably will be the child’s reaction. When these feelings are beating us down, take a minute to, “stop and smell the roses, blow out the candles”. As a HS teacher, I periodically find myself mentally reviewing this statement and attempting to blow out a massive roman candle. Once the smoke clears, I do feel better. Our oldest likes to huff, puff, grab his forehead, and spit blow out a calming candle. As corny as it sounds, the results are well worth the mental embarrassment at first.
“BONJOUR!” we both replied, looking around and pointing like we were in a church or something.
I don't want to listen to someone mourning the last episode of gossip girl or how their life is ending because they can't afford a chanel bag.
Tracy Morrison, 24 Sheridan Drive; 245 Canal Street John A. and Michelle A. Sciabarrasi; Conor I. and Katherine O. Anderson 31 Wildwood Road; Kristen E. Webb 156 Old Ocean Street; 83 Norwell Road Heather A. Gilmore; Alex G. and Lindsay Kokoros 7 Garden Gate Way; Valery Zelixon and Victoria Kurlyanchik 10 White Hollard Drive
The colors of the designer paper perfectly matched the pretty pink of the Thickers that I pulled from my craft stash. I love the contrast, dimension and texture they bring to this project, and how girlie and romantic it is, overall. It is just a happy design that makes me smile inside out!
Ok enough about the teary-eyed part and on to the food!
Chicago-wise it also gets sticky in regards to a piece by Andreas Gursky and the Museum of Contemporary Art. Matthew Marks, the gallerist who’s famously declared that all of his artists belong in museums, sold on of Gursky’s Avenue of the Americas prints to Refco. The deal being that Refco would eventually give it to the MCA. The MCA owns 10% now, Refco pledged the remaining 90% be given to the MCA by 2008. This is all uncertain now that the collection is being auctioned as part of Refco’s bankruptcy.
It felt so good to hold hands with her and walk around the city together.
Rants. I get a bit disturbed reading stuff like this. Yes, I know. It’s freedom of expression, and the web could be a good outlet for this. With billions of users, we could all rant away without being noticed, and feel free about it. The web allows us to a convenient method of self expression. But sometimes, reading it is unhealthy. Thus, I refrain from posting about this now. I’d rather not backread my shit only to find out I was resentful back then.
Assemble the flowers
In the splash page, note that Cole has signed this story “J. Cole,” in plain block letters, with no attempt at flourish or style. Unlike many artists, Cole did not create a stylized signature and “brand” his work with it. Here’s Cole’s signature from the pages of Plastic Man #1 (1943).
all night. He held out a hand, said
Its off to plan for "Bird Day". Happy Teaching!
Then put both the Outer and Inner Thickness to 100%. This will give you a nice thick border. Like I use {HERE}.
Inklings of this problem began to surface while we were still unmarried but just friends. I’d be talking about some random event or another, and he’d interrupt with, “But you already told me you had an appointment for that night, right?”
Despite my previous complaints about traditional Beef Wellington, you can’t combine this many delicious ingredients, in this type of preparation, and have it come out poorly. The flavor was rich, very decadent, and delicious. A stuffed burger is the only case where well-done is an acceptable temperature because the contrast of textures is great and the meat stays moist from the filling. Really amazing, but not really a hamburger.
It's officially winter here in Alabama! We've had some below freezing weather and you know what that means.... massive amounts of people flocking to the grocery store to stock up on milk and bread. Thankfully, we have milk and bread at our house and more importantly - grape Fanta.
In order to give them some flavor, I wished, aloud, that we had some hot sauce.
Whether it be Islam or Roman Catholicism, the adherents are kept in line through a mixture of guilt and fear. Everything we do is a sin. It's wrong. We're made to feel guily. If we step out of line we are punished, so the fear of punishment keeps the people in line. Whether it be excommunication (the Pope claims that he alone holds the keys to heaven and if he withdraws his blessing and prevents you from attending Mass (excommunication), he condemns you to purgatory)
Maybe it could be like when I saw the movie Godzilla, and the next day was a foggy day and as I looked out the garage through the mist I could see in my minds eye, as you may be doing now, Godzilla coming up the hill from the creek where the toads and rabbits lived, through the fog towards me. Coming FOR me. I’ve thought of that before, but not too many times, and I don’t know why something scary like Godzilla headed straight through the fog for you is such a good memory for me.
The most memorable laugh I got was… Sorry that is not something I can tell you! Or the rest of the world.
It can be helpful to observe whether we (or others) are really listening to the child when they first indicate something (by word, action or mood), or are we ignoring all of that and just reacting to the explosion later? We need to take responsibility for ensuring that they are well rested and well fed.
Have a lovely evening everyone.
Thank you BBC3 for that lovely four minute tribute to Annie’s last moments and interview with Lenora Crichlow.
Memories define us. So what if you lost yours every time you went to sleep? Your name, your identity, your past, even the people you love — all forgotten overnight. And the one person you trust may be telling you only half the story. Welcome to Christine’s life.Because my mother had Alzheimer's, I have spent a lot of time thinking about memory. My first-grade teacher told my mother I had a photographic memory, but that isn't true. I did have a very good memory and memorized whole picture books, but that's because I loved stories and because I paid attention and because I probably had my parents read the stories over and over and over to me. I really hate it, these days, when I can't put my finger on a name or a word I want to use. Sometimes, even simple words. It scares me, wondering if this is an early sign of Alzheimer's or simply old age catching up with me. I like to think maybe it's as simple as having 72 years of memories that I have to sort through to come up with that single word I'm trying to find.
Capitulate against us and are up.
But first, he needs a wife...
Check out this necklace that two butterflies made over using nail polish. Yes, you read that right. I never would have thought of that. Isn't it pretty?
Forty years ago tomorrow The Beatles broke up and with it broke the hearts of a generation says Jonathan deBurca Butler.
I went with the Nora first. This is an interpretation of an Egyptian spice beer. It is spiced with ginger, myrrh, and orange peel. The spices come through well but with a nice balance. Not overdone at all. It has an estery nose with a spicy quality to it. The myrrh comes through nicely as well as the ginger. The taste is very similar to the smell, but a little stone fruit comes through. At first it had a slight metallic taste, but that faded as the beer warmed. All in this is a very complex beer, I'm glad I finally got to try it.
Ok, so, what's a blog hop without prizes, eh? Of course our hostess has a few surprises for you! I've heard that there is a free digi drawn by hers-truly, and there are some wonderful sponsors offering prize packs for her celebration... so, what do you have to do? If you haven't visited Jess yet, you'll want to go see her birthday creations, messages, videos, etc.. and you'll meet Christina, Carisa, Cass, and Krissy over the next 2 days.. leave us all some love and of course, don't forget to go on over and leave our hostess with the mostest some birthday happies as well!
“Sora do you swear to follow and uphold our rules set forth by your ancestors? To unselfishly put the lives of your people before your own, until you have drawn your last breath. To rule your people with kindness, understanding, and strength till you can no longer do so.”
How do we change this habit and get the baby to nap in his crib? Neither H nor J was a car sleeper, so this is weird to me. Can he nap in a car seat until kindergarten? Should I care? What do you think?
* Audience Favorite Show
10. Famous Groupies
On the first day back, it took all my effort to attempt not to cry constantly. I succeeded in the not constantly part. The drive to work was difficult. It was so final. My baby is gone so I have to go back to work. This, of course, made me cry. I tried to only let myself cry a little though; I didn't want to set precedence for the rest of the day. Yeah, totally didn't work. I cried on the walk to my desk. Just being in the building, walking by people I hadn't seen in a month was enough to overwhelm me. I also cried at my desk. I came back on the first Wednesday of the month, which is when we have lab meetings. I skipped it. I decided there was no way I could be around everyone my first day back. Instead, I went down to my mom's office to talk. I told her how difficult it was being back and how I was afraid everyone would ignore me, which would make being back so much worse. She said she had told people and was sure they wouldn't ignore me. I was hopeful but knew, under certain situations, the same person will almost always act the same.
They all try to tell me how to parent, I blame the wrong child all the time apparently, don’t listen to their side of the story, make excuses for the youngest, tell the eldest she should know better, the youngest tells me I don’t understand her at all or what her life is like. Today, while cooking lunch, they each came into the kitchen in turn to point out my faults and wrongdoings.
Kong Jin : I hope many people would listen to us and we could have many shows. and I hope the situation of band become more interesting in many ways.
During second grade one of my best buddies was a boy named Scott. We would race into school the day after The Monkees appeared on The Banana Splits show and discuss in detail the episode. At one point during the school year I was out sick for a couple weeks, and Scott sent me a card with a drawing of The Monkees with all of their instruments. It was a prized possession for a very long time. I moved at the end of second grade and never saw Scott again. I don't even know what his last name was. In second grade you just aren't very concerned about those things.
“White Water, Black Gold” is a sober look at the untold costs (to water and people) associated with developing the second largest deposit of “oil” in the world.
She went out on a limb to recommend this new approach.
So confused feel like I'm going zig-zag
Larkin was right…
WINTER WINDS by Mumford and Sons. This is it. The relationships in this book are all winter relationships. They're going to have to do some growing if they're going to make it to spring. (Love this song. Mention of pestilence wins it extra points.)
“As a matter of fact, I am!” He seemed very pleased with himself and continued to warble.
For the first couple of weeks I kept my account really quiet, following only a blog buddy who was about to give birth, a couple of South Africans I'm interested in and my SIL. Then I went public with the blog and happily sought out all those people I'd been keen to follow on twitter for years, plus hosts of random parent bloggers, mothers and fathers - people I thought it would be useful to network with for the blog.
I ordered Margin Call by mail on Netflix.
However, when I took up running my experience was a little different. As is pretty evident at this point, my budget is REALLY tight. I am the queen of bargain shopping and I have come up with many crafty ways to have over 100 pairs of really fabulous shoes on my budget. But running shoes are totally different. First off, they can be SUPER expensive and they wear out kind of quickly (especially when compared to the shoes I have owned since freshman year of college and are still going strong). A good pair of running shoes can get about 500 miles on it, but some really vary. I run a lot of miles, so 500 miles goes by a lot quicker than my budget can handle at $100 a pop. On the other hand, you really don’t want to skimp when it comes to your running shoes. I have a knee injury that needs kindness, and I want to be running for a lot of years to come. So here are a couple tips for buying great running shoes when you’re on a budget.
We got in there and we noticed the other attraction about Taco Mac, the Cougaring. A few seasoned sistas that went to my undergrad were hollering at my boy, so he struck up convo with them and we joined them at their table. They told me that I was suspect as I was wearing an extra-medium Affliction shirt. In Houston, brothas with some muscle on their frames can wear extra mediums with no big deal, but in Atlanta, they'll think you're batting for the other side.
Again the angel is sent to Earth on a quest by God. This trip he has to bring him the name of the person that best continues the work of his son on Earth.
-You must use a project created or posted on your blog after this date ( March 15th 2012 ). No old projects please!
One word can sum up this year’s spring theme and that is “femininity.”
Can you be something that you are not? Can you become something other than
My team has built a fantastic web product – His Catalog. What few people know is that I did nearly all of the web design, functional development and SEO. My lead engineer built an amazingly scalable back-end and my lead stylist wrote a ton of content for the site. But building a big product with a small team is hard. We didn’t have the resources to hire SEO experts, designers, or testers. We did it all on a shoestring budget.
When the ego desire body is in control, you easily become a victim of circumstances and of those around you, for you are always seeking validation of Self-worth from the outside world and from other people. Accomplishment, wealth and status are measurements of worthiness in the third- / fourth- dimensional reality; however, a true sense of Self-worth comes from within as you open your Sacred Heart and Sacred Mind to the Divine Love / Wisdom / Will-power endowed upon all sentient Beings by our Father / Mother God. Love is the centrifugal force that creates harmony.
At first I really wasn’t sure how I would feel about this book. After all, it started out by saying that our hero was on his way to become a wizard, something I found rather strange for story it was supposed to tell. I continued to read and was pleasantly surprised to find that it wasn’t some odd attempt to bring the occult into a Christian allegory but just a lie about what Celestia really was. I found the fear and hatred of those who decided to go to Celestia even more severe than they were in the original, which I found realistic considering the current state of opinion when it comes to Christianity from the public right now. If you don’t know what I’m talking about, take five minutes and go read comments on articles on yahoo. You’ll quickly figure out that Christian bashing is all the rage right now. I also found the confusion over what the right choice is, is far more clear in this version of the tale. In the original, the right choice seems obvious to the reader but not the character. In this version it is less obvious to both which I think helped show how easy it can be to make the wrong choices.
Soon after this Naru’s father and other men spearheading the path for independence track down Ao with little regard to Naru. Following this Rebecca of Pied Piper goes to negotiate Elena’s return and is met with some hostility while Fleur helps with the rescue operations and Ivica heads off to talk with someone about the Nirvash’s pilot.
It seemed odd to think that only thirty hours ago I had been sitting in a Starbucks having coffee. But then that man with the formidable mustache had sat down next to me. He made me an offer and I'd run through the gamut of usual excuses, but to no avail. And actually, I couldn't pull off the hypocrisy of not wanting a million bucks.
G (note V) = G - B - D (1st + 3rd + 5th note of the G scale)
Annette and Doug Conlon have been playing together (haha) for a long time. Music brought them together as a couple and they played their first gig singing harmonies more than 15 years ago. After many years of different musical pursuits they have decided to join forces again to lend vocal support to each other as well as dipping into each other's songwriting (forbidden territory!)
During the second session I attended (there were looooooooots of options during each time slot) the panel addressed concerns that mommy bloggers have about privacy issues that come up when blogging about our children. We discussed what our biggest fears are that give us pause when we post about our children and one of the panelists gave some perspective about some of it. For example, the top fear among the group was sexual predators getting information from our blogs and finding our children and she gave statistics (I know, 85% of statistics are made up on the spot. Heh.) which, if they can be believed, show that predators are going to take the easy route. That would be to try to get to kids who live where they live. It's much more work to stalk a family on the internet and go find them. Makes sense. Panelists also gave differing points of view on the matters discussed and shared what their different practices/policies are when it comes to blogging about their children. Crystal is irreverent and hilarious and lets it all hang out, whereas Ms. Lowe is a more private blogger and does not show pictures of her children's faces, which she says has made her become a more thoughtful photographer. She also has a funny post up right now in which she recounts her difficulty not sneezing during a conversation with Emily Posts's great-great-granddaughter Anna Post, who is apparently here. I noticed some Emily Post kids' books and wondered about them; will have to stop by that booth tomorrow.
P and I have always felt that mealtime is family time. Eating meals together as a family is important to us and always has been. We tried many things to try and resolve this issue. We all played musical chairs around the table, trying to find an arrangement that worked for C, but with only the four of us (and the discovery that H's chewing bothered C, too) and the table only being so big, nothing really worked. We tried playing music in the background at dinner to try and mask all the chewing noises, and that worked up to a point, but C needed the music to be so loud that the rest of us really couldn't carry on conversations around the table. Mealtime became a silent, angry, resentful time in our family.
About Infinitive Analytics
But you know what? Being sick is very expensive. Health care is a huge drain on our national economy, as anyone who has been paying attention knows.
I’m really disappointed by what that all means: there’s going to be very little member participation in the awards. We won’t get to vote, and only a handful of us, if any, will be involved in the juries, which are unclearly stated to "comprise individuals directly or indirectly related to the writing, publishing and bookselling genre fields". Although everyone who reads a book is at least indirectly related to the publishing fields, the intention seems to be to limit the jurors to industry types. Ordinary BFS members are going to pay for the awards, but will have practically no say in the results. (Except in so far as their recommendations will contribute to the shortlist, and that contribution may be discounted at the discretion of the juries – see below.)
I think a lot of invisible illness sufferers, or really anyone with any sort of illness, understands me when I say I’m just planning to get through the next five minutes. For me, it’s the next five minutes plus a second book. Grad school sounds like an adventure. A boyfriend sounds nice, too.
At the end of last year, I made a post about trying to blog more and that I had gotten sucked into the black hole of genealogy. A friend of mine mentioned I should read the post "Blogging without Obligation". I did, and now feel a bit more comfortable about my absences.
First, the inaugural Not-been-given-a-name-yet Trophy for non-English language pieces goes to this entry by Atis:
The American Heart Association’s mission is building healthier lives, free of cardiovascular diseases and stroke. Our 2020 impact goal is to improve the cardiovascular health of all Americans, by 20 percent, while reducing deaths from cardiovascular disease and stroke by 20 percent.
Nothing lasts
As most of you know, I've been spending time learning metal work, and it's definitely not without the oopsies!
According to a 2011 World Growth Report, Indonesia annually produces over 18 million tonnes of palm oil, making it one of the world’s largest producers and exporters of palm oil.
has a lot on its plate at the moment.
But you know what, she was just as loving and respectful as Ashley and Heather.
dots; Fiskars deckle scissors; foam tape; foam ink blending tool; felt ink blending tool; circle punch; TH paper distresser; scallop scissors; steel wool; Sizzix texture boutique; TH texture fade ‘Cracked’, ‘Snowflakes’
So expect to see some of my money saving techniques on here now! I think it will be a great addition to the blog!
In all the excitement of going back and forth talking about the design, I never mentioned that I was left handed. I completely forgot to mention it. Not a word, nothing, nada, zippo. In case you are new to guns and have yet to order your first holster, I would like to offer you some handy dandy advice...Be sure to tell your holster maker if you are left handed. Seems obvious, you say? Well, who asked you?!
All that sprayed up hair only made us laugh
One Pack of 10 Flower Shape Sparkly Buttons
“In God’s Country” and “Trip Through Your Wires” both have a strong 1960s feel to me. Whenever I hear these songs, my mind almost always flashes back to the memory of hearing Simon & Garfunkel’s “The Sound of Silence” (the single version, with the added electric guitar) on a portable record player at the pool in the downtown YWCA, where my mom used to take me swimming. I’m not entirely sure what it is, but there’s just some sense of brightness in the sound of these songs that I associate with that time.
To dance, wide skirts going round and round, cymbals
A perfect pink dot that looks like a balloon floating in our sunlit upper atmosphere.
Oh, if life were so simple. I was working on a post about Sudeley Castle on Thursday evening (yes, the same day my camera went on the fritz) when my computer froze, then started flashing windows and doomsday, death-to-my-hard-drive, loss-of-all-my-files-and-my-first-born warnings. I ran upstairs and woke my poor husband up from a deep sleep so that he could solve my computer EMERGENCY! He sadly informed me that my computer had been infected with malware and, although my data was safe (he would back everything up in safe mode before fixing the malware problem) it would take some time for him to fix things and 1 am on a workday was not the best time.
My match-up is as follows:
it's easy to make a list of all the ways to respect someone. but it seems like a lot of the time, in our culture there is a definite line between respect that is had for adults versus children – it seems like the one who stands on the adult side of the line deserves the respect just because of where they're standing and the one who stands on the child side hasn't quite earned it yet.
I have spent a good deal of time trying to figure out why it is that I am having such difficulty getting another post on this topic together and I believe I have figured out the problem. Last week I really wanted to put a face to autism, to show what it looks like in reality. I want to show how wonderful these children are and how the extra challenges they present are part of what makes them so wonderful. I want people to have patience with them and not judge them when they are having a difficult time. I want people to understand that in order to improve the behavior the parent or therapist may have to let it play out some.
The only way to properly visualize not doing something is to actually find a word for what you want to do and visualize that.
- my organic white cake mix
Creeping With the Enemy (Langdon Prep) by Kimberly Reid
Pat Robertson, the head bigot of American Evangelism, steals the bigotry biscuit, as usual, for making the most egregiously racist and inhuman remark. Robertson was quoted as saying Haiti had been “cursed” because of what he called a “pact with the devil” earlier in its history.
Well, must go and get some more cards made, but I will leave you with a photo of Dylan just after he has blown out the candles on his Birthday Cake, then a close up of his cake, and then Hadley's. Isn't their Mummy wonderful to be able to make cards like these?
“Have fun,” says Mom.
Denise – Soar high charming lady, all the best in your endeavors.
Sometimes close to my heart….
Expectations
there are some things that are nice about it.
Aimee kindly sent me a fitted cloth diaper and fleece diaper cover to review. She has recently branched out and started to make her own fitted diaper pattern. The fitted diaper is turned and topstiched for durability and comfort of baby. The diaper has three layers plus two snap in inserts. The diaper outer is made from a cotton knit. A hidden layer of bamboo hemp fleece is in between the outer layer and the cotton velour inner. The bi-fold soaker is made of one layer of cotton velour on the top and a layer of bamboo hemp terry. When this is folded in half, it creates four layers of protection. The other soaker snaps into the inside of the bi-fold soaker. It is made of two layers of heavy bamboo fleece. The cover is made out of fleece with an extra layer in the wet zone.
This project has become far less fun than it was imagined to be at the outset, however we shall press on.
Yet, placed on my refrigerator with a green magnet reminding me to recycle, is a chart. A chart that shows the ranges of basic skills for children, both "typical" children and those with Down syndrome. According to this chart, "typical" children begin sitting between six and nine months. Eslea will be eight months Saturday.
Regardless of fuzzy tummy feelings, though, these silly geese have a lot longer to go before it’ll even be acceptable to give them an actual romance, and right now, they have a famous legend to encounter – the Black Dog, or rather, something based off of it. The script I’m working on is a fantasy-based setting that is based off of several different places and time periods in terms of environment, government, architecture, culture, and folklore, telling the story of a fresh-out-of-training soldier with a lot to hide, nothing to lose, and how their life changes throughout several different stories, ranging from action to drama, and essentially goes through a lot of good, a lot of bad, and a lot of plot-rich things hidden in even the most seemingly irrelevant pieces of their life when they wind up being carted off to war at the worst possible time.
The afro wig was a nice touch, Dr. Credit. Really helped sell the noir-like mystique of the character. What was your favorite part, the unexpectedly attractive nurse or "Tanks, Dodda Credit"?
1 mutual
The crowd responded, “Hooah!”
§ MR. WILSON, in reply said, that £1,977 was the whole sum which this picture would cost, with the exception of £2 2s. 2d. paid for its carriage from Paris. All other expenses were paid by the seller. The purchase of the picture was recommended solely by the director of the National Gallery, but was acquiesced in and decided upon by the trustees. Whatever difference of opinion there might be as to the value of the picture, there could, he thought, be none as to its authenticity, for it stood in the position of being, perhaps, the best authenticated picture of the kind in the world. In Venice, where the picture had remained from the time of its being painted up to a very recent date, it was well known to have been the production of Paolo Veronese; and besides that, it was mentioned as his work and as belonging to the church from which it had been taken, in a book which was published in 1581, eight years after the date at which it was painted, and seven years before the death of the artist. In the British Museum there was a print of the picture, which was engraved in the year 1649."
This week we are holding a two week challenge so that our DT can have next week off to enjoy Christmas with their families. So that means you will have until December 30th to enter this challenge. Our theme this week is to create something with a tag or pocket on it!
Sheryl Sandberg, COO of Facebook, always leaves the office at 5.30 so that she can have dinner with her kids at 6 (via Laura at 11d). I’m pretty sure that her commute is not like the average commute of the working mother of young children (bluemilk nails it as usual), and she probably has someone at home preparing the dinner, too, so she doesn’t have to spend the first half hour with tired, hungry, fractious kids while she scrambles some food together for everyone. She almost certainly spends lots of time later in the evening working in some way, and when she is in Washington talking to the President, she might have to be a virtual presence at dinner.
Staten Island is decidedly suburban in feel compared to the other boroughs, and it is the only borough without a subway system connected to the other boroughs - it is serviced by a fairly extensive bus system. But for real exploration of the hinterlands, it is best to have your own wheels.
-Afraid of birthmother changing her mind
In 1817 King of Prussia, Fredrick William III, forced a unification between the Reformed Churches (Calvin) and Lutheran Churches (Luther) in his realm. The skeptical Modern period was under way, and it seemed odd that Protestants were still taking their peculiar confessions so seriously. This was the predecessor to Rodney King’s cry, “can’t we all just get a long?” Well, in fact, no, we cannot.
Hooters (going out on a limb with this one)
For the rest:
WE’RE GONNA ROOT ROOT ROOT ROOT WHITE SOX
The memorial reading will have a combination of power point presentation, music and a memorial flyer. It will be an hour-long presentation reviewing the lives and haiku of 22 poets who have died in the past couple of years.
(we’ve come from that far away), scattered
mutual admiration pact, Prince and Bush share some
Alright, Glee. That’s what I’m talking about. After a very disappointing return from the mid-season finale, you’re back at full-power with what was without question the best “tribute” episode of the entire series. I wish that it has not been four days since I watched this episode because some of the plot details have become sort of hazy in the buzzed state of mind I’ve been in thanks to my sinus pressure and allergy medication because the only other episodes from this season of Glee that I thought were as good as this one were “On My Way” and “The First Time.” So, while I’m going to have plenty of rave things to say about how much I enjoyed this episode (whether it was the uniformly beautiful musical performances, the actual storytelling on display during the “tribute” episode, or the numerous times the episode made me cry), this will likely be a relatively short review just because of the sheer amount of writing I have to get out of the way today. Regardless, I’m still managing to find myself amazed about how much I was able to enjoy an episode dedicated to Whitney Houston even though I wasn’t especially familiar with a lot of her music before I watched this episode.
The Red March
Yantra de Vilder is a composer and sound artist who has worked in film, television, radio and advertising for over twenty years. Her eclectic blend of musical talents encompasses composition, arranging, direction, conducting and performance. A versatile collaborator and consultant, Yantra is Creative Director of Labyrinth Studios.
boxer...we chose the colors together. i spared all y'all the various colors swatches that were painted on the walls, but know, we have at least 20 in the garage!
sugar, to taste (optional)
Mr. Browne said: “It appeared it was in the process of detonating, but it malfunctioned.”
Those fantastic Oliver Goldsmith sunglasses again - these are the butterfly version - there are very few of these out there. The coat is 1960s marabou and that fan in most likely antique. There is a subtle play on a theme here - wings and feathers.....
A few months later, I had a license and a bike of my own, and it was then that I began to really love San Francisco. The freedom and mobility opened up the city, the Bay Area, and the whole state to me—I saw a lot of gorgeous places in my pursuit of curvy roads. I was so excited about riding that I would get up earlier on the weekends to hit the twisties than I did during the week to go to work. I explored the coast north and south of the city, the East Bay hills, the Santa Cruz mountains, and the back roads of Marin and Sonoma, including many places I would never have thought to visit in a car.
Nature is sacred to me and these starlings are special to my soul.
Merrell: This doesn't concern you Gerardo.
i’m excited about the opportunities that lie ahead, and my heart is full.
Then we went down to my parents house and just had a great time with family. We stayed the night there, ate yummy food, went to their church and just enjoyed each other's company. I am SO gratefull they live an hour away! That rarely happens when you are a military family!
Want to hear something pathetic? This totally confirms my addiction. After Eric left I found myself trying to mentally tally the dollars in my purse because the Dollar Tree has pregnancy tests. Uhhh yeah! Terrible right? After I realized what I was doing I stopped right then and I didn't have the urge for the rest of the day. Actually I found it quite freeing not having a test around to wonder about while my thoughts turn in circles of hope, then logic, then hope, then logic...it sucks and it is an emotional/mental roller coaster I want off of. I got off of it today!! Yay ME! :)
1/3 cup Coca-Cola
UPDATE 3/1/11: Added solution to how to get into crypt in puzzles section along with secret passage maps, an extra secret passage in Future Balzakia (though the treasure is technically inaccessible until a third key comes out). Currently working on getting Crypt secret passages.
One of the comments argues that the labour shortage in places like the Alberta tar sands is manufactured by purposely offering low wages and no benefits to drive away any domestic interest so that companies will have little option but to import TFWs. I think this is right on the mark. At the right pay coupled with other incentives you can easily attract the labour you desire but there seems to be no interest in doing this. There is also the option to train and retain employees but there is no interest in doing this either which appears to be especially true with the construction industry. If there is a labour shortage in this country Canadian businesses share some of the blame.
Once Paul knew that God meant business he never faltered. To do so would have been disobedience and sin.
"Marriner resumed active participation in his family's various businesses, including First Security Corporation, Amalgamated Sugar Company, and Utah Construction Company. As the latter got into mining, it was renamed Utah Construction and Mining, still later as Utah International, Inc. Under Marriner's leadership the firm was sold to General Electric in 1976. Marriner Eccles was also active in speaking and writing about three issues that concerned him: world overpopulation; U.S. involvement in the Vietnam War; and the recognition of Red China."
This is brilliant. You don't even have to know what he's ranting about to enjoy. But, just for some background: Kevin Rudd (the former, now knifed PM of Australia) and his side-kick Treasurer Wayne Swan, decided that they would start taxing the successful Australian mining sector to squeeze money so they could waste even more on their pet Union projects. The big mining companies didn't like this idea (who would?) and started an advertising campaign against the government, which affected their poll numbers in the negative. It has now been revealed that Twiggy Forrest, an Australian mining boss, made a deal with Kevin Rudd behind closed doors to support the tax so that the heat on the government could cool. However, Mr Swan decided that Rudd had to go - even though Swan was the one who pushed for the mining tax - and ganged up with Gillard to dispose of Rudd. Once Rudd was gone, Swan and Gillard made a deal with the 3 huge non-Australian owned mining companies - no details have been released about what they got from the government to stop their advertising blitz - and cut Twiggy out of the deal. Joe Hildebrand - a conservative journalist - knew about the Twiggy deal with Kevin Rudd 3 years ago and reported on it back then, but no one took notice. Now that more details have emerged about the knifing of not only Rudd but Twiggy as well, and now that the major Australian newspapers have sat up and noticed, has this whole sordid affair been reported on. It just goes to show how devious the ruling Labor Party is. They have a long track-record of broken promises and doing grubby deals. They want the pie and to eat it too. We the tax payer will be paying off their debt for a long time. We had $0 deficit under John Howard and then Kevin Rudd and his merry bandits were elected into office at the end of 2007, and they have racked up debt to the tune of over $230 BILLION in just 4 short years. And what have we got to show for it apart from some school halls, cashed up Unions, and burnt houses from their disastrous Pink Batt roof insulation scheme? NOTHING!
Uttarā is the wife of Abhimanyu (son of Arjuna & Kṛṣṇa’s sister, Subhadra), future mother of Parīkṣit.
Harvey: (still distracted and mumbling) ... a heckuva lot of gain ...
1. Introduction
Dimensionals
Alogon
Jesse: Keep talking…
I don't know if that will get any better in the coming month. I've got a house to decorate, cookies to bake, presents to wrap, and a cat to keep out of my Christmas tree. But I know we're all busy during December, so I can't really use that excuse. The excuse I will use, though, is my plethora of writing activities.
Second, it hurts to get your hopes up to only fall back in soon. Yet I am learning to take each day as a gift the strong days and weak days. Both are a gift. God is so good either way. He is always sustaining us.
Champix is a trade name for the drug Varenicline. It is a drug specifically designed to stop people smoking. It does this by blocking the nicotine receptors in your brain, therefore the cigarette does nothing for you. The course is 12 weeks long, with 1 tablet twice a day. The tablets are well presented, packaged in a 2 week blister pack, marked morning and night for each day of the week. If like me you can never remember even 5 minutes after taking a tablet if you have took it or not, this is very handy, in fact it is the champix packet which is making sure I remember I take my other medication!
Carlen K Makeup
These people are different, they are afraid, I can sense their fear. They offer no threat to me. They are vulnerable and easy prey but MHM offers them protection. He does not even know them. They should have their own pack to protect them and look after them. Old humans should have respect, they have been responsible for the success of the pack when they were young and strong and have been leaders in the past. They have earned this.
I'm not sure on the "stocking up" advice, but I do think it's fascinating to ask the question of whether nature or nurture matters more. There's an old joke that parenting advice books are all written for first time parents because once you have the second one, you realize how little of it you actually control. You feed kids the same things and interact with them the same way at dinner, and yet one will lustily eat lox, capers, tomatoes and anything else you put in front of him, and the other screams when a strawberry touches his vanilla yogurt, thereby tainting it. Some children love to sleep and others decide that sleep is for the weak and flabby. Most disconcertingly, I recall reading not long ago an essay in O magazine from the mother of Dylan Klebold, one of the Columbine shooters. There is really no evidence that she raised her son in anything but a normal fashion, the same as plenty of his peers. And yet look what he did.
- Welcome Baby Stamp set
And before any of you ladies call me a pig, bear in mind this came from my wife:
Then I primed and painted the chrome mirror track the same color as my wall. That way if any showed, the illusion would be of wall showing. And by the way - re-doing a bathroom is messy work.
I asked her if I could walk with her.
How to Play Any Instrument: Notes are notes. Most of the intermediate musicians I know have a very surface understanding of music theory and get scared when they hear the phrase. It’d be great to have a resource that wasn’t so scary.
As you can tell from my blog, I’m an avid, excited and sing it from the rooftops pussy eater who just LOVES to get down with the get down (no head push necessary).
Our first sponsor is Emma from CRAFTY EMMA'S STORE, she has a fantastic selection of crafting goodies to add to your stash and an excellent clearance corner where there are lots of bargains to be had, so why not pop on over now if you can't wait to see if you're the lucky winner!!! Our winner will receive a Gift Voucher to spend in Emma's Store (p&p NOT included).
“It’s Lin-Credible”
I guess the part that makes me most bitter about our zoo experience, other than the fact that none of the animals were out and about and every square inch was being renovated, was that we had to pay the initial admission to get in and then an additional fee to do other “fun stuff” within the zoo. Want to ride the “train”? $5! Cha-ching. Want to play in the cool water part of the park? $5! Cha-ching. Basically, the zoo is like the nickel and dime DirecTV packages – you pay for basics, but if you want the truly cool stuff, expect to double your bill!
Just because life got tough,
An interesting week. The market opened the week with a large gap down, the fifth gap opening in six trading days, and traded down to SPX 1359 in the first half hour. That was the low for the week. The market then recovered, somewhat, on monday and tuesday. Then AAPL’s earnings were released after tuesday’s close. On wednesday the market rallied, despite a ‘hold the course’ FOMC statement. Thursday the rally continued. Then on friday Q1 GDP was reported lower than expected, but the market still managed to end higher. For the week the SPX/DOW were +1.65%, and the NDX/NAZ were +2.35%. Asian markets were -0.6%, European markets were +1.0%, and the DJ World index rose 1.1%. Economic reports were mixed, with negatives outpacing positives 7 to 6. On the uptick: new/pending homes sales, FHFA, new home prices, consumer sentiment and the monetary base. On the downtick: Q1 GDP, WLEI, Case-Shiller, durable goods orders, the M1-multiplier, and weekly jobless claims rose. Next week we’ll get reports on monthly Payrolls, ISM, Chicago PMI and Auto sales. Best to your week!
New to Word press? Whether you’re a beginner or a professional, you’re invited to get involved in my Weekly Competition to help you meet your blogging goals and give you another way to take part in 2012 Water Dragon Event. Everyone is welcome to participate, if your blog is about photography,Videography, Graphic Artwork Or Writing .
It wouldn’t be so bad if they managed to do it in a place where I could walk away and not have to hear the sound. However, it pretty much only happens during class. And you can’t exactly say anything to them. One of my friends did so once and the whole class laughed at him. The argument does seem ridiculous when you say it out loud. That doesn’t stop me from wishing I could stab my pen through my classmate’s throat when he chooses to sit next to me and smack his gum for an entire hour and fifteen minute lecture.
This isn't exactly a comedy sketch, but A.) this list wouldn't feel right without it; and B.) it's one of cinema's greatest non sequiturs courtesy of one of history's finest sketch groups. The scene begins with Roman legionnaires chasing would-be messiah Brian up a parapet, segues into a minute or so of intergalactic insanity, and ends. That's what I love about Monty Python films - they're always keen to blow thousands of dollars on fantastically pointless scenes.
Hi everyone. Sorry for the delayed post today, but I forgot that I was going to post today since I had shared the Your Memories Here dt announcement on Wednesday.
Firstly, his comprehensive dismantling of the supposed case for putting troops in Iraq in 2003 lands a far greater blow on the credibility of Tony Blair than I fear any tribunal will ever muster.
This comes on the heels of two terrible nights of sleep, so I was exhausted an actually a little scared of lying down. I was afraid I would spend the night tossing and turning again. But, even though I woke up a couple of times, I was able to fall alseep again right away. I woke up a little before 8, and thought about how wonderful it was that we didn't have to get up and get the girls off to school. I talked to my amazing husband on the phone for a couple of minutes and then I fell back to sleep and dreamed VERY sweet dreams (another thing that has been plauging me for awhile are bad dreams, so this was a nice change). I woke up again to the phone ringing and I felt well rested and refreshed.
As she glances over the words, her face which bore the look of curiosity, now displays a most slight yet pretty smile. She hesitates then turns her head sideways then she focuses her search amongst the sidewalk cafe’s tables then her gaze now is concentrated on the building itself, my building. My heart quickens, my hand clutching my pen, I dare not move a single inch. Then as if all the planets have aligned in a special way just to invoke this single and most beautiful moment, her eyes move upwards and her face finds my face, my eyes studying her’s.
I can not bind it and force submission
In the story of Mary and Martha, Mary sat at the Lord's feet while Martha took care of the preparation. I can guarantee you that if I was present, I would have busied myself with the prep work. Mary was commended for choosing what was "better". If Martha spent more time sitting maybe she would not have been so worried and upset about many things. Maybe if I would sit, His peace would cover my to-do list too!
People expect RESULTS.
NOT ALL THE ADVANCED TECHNOLOGY IS UNDER THE BONNET.
Lake: At about the mile mark, the marsh interface between the creek and Lake Townsend begins on your right. The low bluffs here afford a good aerial view of the channels as they meander through the reeds and islets. (You will see signs of past beaver activity here as well.) After this point, the trail parallels the lake, affording several good views. At about 2.86 miles, you will find a large rocky outcrop directly on the lakeshore, just to the right of the main trail. This spot is exceptionally picturesque spot, perfect for a lunch or perhaps to cast a fishing line in the water. (Note: In dry periods, the water in this entire arm of Lake Townsend retreats dramatically, leaving behind an irregular grassy field.)
A decent camera would have been able to cope more effectively with the contrasts of light and dark, but it's still perfectly acceptable.
Maybe it's different this time. I don't know, but I think so. I think Cooper Green has told his last lie. We'll just have to wait and see, I guess. In the meantime, thank you all for your kindness, and for taking the time to visit so faithfully. It's been fun.
–no node stealing (crafting or quest nodes): “Six people can all chop down the same tree tree at once, and gather the same lumber, as someone who walks up a minute later.”
Here are some more antique photos that LG harvested for your viewing pleasure from various second-hand stores, antique galleries, the Sotheby's Celebrity Auction, Saddam Hussein's ransacked mansions and the Royal Family of England's Garage Sale.
Of course the things that happened here are clearly wrong. Any decent person with an ounce of civility in them would obviously agree. Should Delmon Young have been drunk in public? Again, certainly not! Was it okay to unleash a verbal barrage of “anti-Semitic” slurs at the panhandler, or provoke a bystander? Of course it was not. It was very poor judgement on Young’s part, and it should be dealt with…and with some degree of severity!
The pies and perishables did not last long, but I am still working my way through the tea. I have got through 2 boxes (320 teabags) since May, that’s about 100 teabags a month. I should be safe until Christmas.
Walk’d crowns and crownets; realms and islands were
We decided it was working just fine, and the fact that we still had eyebrows and hair left prompted us to leave it for another day.
All I really had to do was read a scripture to find out where it was (it was the "tight like unto a dish" scrip.) So I just went to the plates and got it there! The picture bellow is the first time I'm holding my call:
Today I get the chance to talk about another new item we are bringing in for CHA. I am so excited! For the last few years I have been using X-Press It High Tack double-sided tape, and I love it. Now, Imagination International is going to start distributing X-Press It Foam Tape.
13 again
Yeah, covers are mighty important for any author or publisher. But you know what else is important?
What the hell do these people do? With that, the woman walks out, still jabbering away and I'm left standing there in the bathroom stall slack jawed and wondering...so did the clown ever show up?
Groundwater is drawn from aquifers. There are two types of aquifers an operator needs to be aware of – an unconfined aquifer and a confined aquifer. An unconfined aquifer is an aquifer that is restricted by an impervious layer on the bottom but not on top. Confined aquifers are those that are covered (confined) by an impermeable or semi-permeable layer of rock on both the top and bottom. A confined aquifer is also called an artesian aquifer.
For those of you who aren’t aware of what a sling library is, it’s a very simple concept. You pay a deposit (and then, often a small hire charge) and you can try out a range of slings before you buy. Slings aren’t cheap – they can’t be, really, because they’ve got to be very well made to support your precious little bundle. So, you can imagine that I felt very despondent at the fact that my local one had vanished into the ether.
“Are you serious?” I asked him.
As you can see, I'm not showing yet. But I'm sure I will soon! I know that once you've been pregnant before, you show a lot sooner. With Grayson it wasn't until like 20-22 weeks that you could tell. We'll see how it goes with this little guy/gal...
‘Oh, I’ll come with you,’ said Melinda.
More later. Peace.
Many home based small business owners may not be aware that capital gains tax may apply to the sale of their home. Your home is usually exempt from tax when sold due to a specific exemption in the taxation laws. In this article we outline the criteria which may require tax to paid on the sale of your home.
He couldn't wait until Sunday to give it to me.
Al Jardine - vocals
- Add dry ingredients slowly and beat slowly until well incorporated...cookie dough will be soft
A little like Jo Walton’s Mor, who picks up I Capture the Castle thinking it’s about medieval siege strategy but finds a delightful novel instead, I picked up The Green Man in the hopes of reading more along the lines of the Arthurian trails I’ve been following with my middle son. The Green Man is, in fact, the name of a bookstore, so while I did not get what I was looking for, I got what I wanted.
basin and rill, hurrying but hardly giving
It's things like this that make me really love the stage they are in right now. Too darn cute!
And, it all went that way…for the most part…!?!
Shareology skipped over to Rick Bronson’s House of Comedy at the Mall of America for Social Media Breakfast Minneapolis – St. Paul #24 for a panel of retail business people who are using or exploring the use of social media.
Amy Balkins
Espir ML, Hall, JW, Shirreffs JG, Stevens DL. Impotence in farm workers using toxic chemicals. Br Med J 1970; 14: 423-425.
I love it when a plan comes together!
Later that night, the new OB on call came in and said, "We will be keeping you until you deliver. Your labs are not great. Specialist will be in to see you tomorrow." I was like I am staying until JULY?? WTHeck. She just smiled and left after the exam & questions. Little did I know what the next 48 hours would be. I asked to shower, and my OB said "Quickly, I will come and drag you out if its too long." Well my mother was there too, so no worries & really relaxing shower on L&D, NOPE!!!
You can listen to the show here. I came in about 15 minutes into it, a replacement for Senator Turzai, who's spearheading privatization in the Legislature, but couldn't make it today. Like I said, I thought I did well, but there were so many things I just didn't have time for! Like all this:
Below we show some of the basics for men.
“What do I do,” I asked rolling the box over in my hand like a Rubik’s cube.
6. Bake for 8-10 minutes, or until lightly golden brown around the edges. Remove from oven and transfer to a rack until they are completely cooled. Store in an air-tight container.
___ a claim that your book was top in its sub-sub-genre on Amazon’s free Kindle best-selling list both yesterday and today?
Hot properties this year are novels Amnesia by Savita Kalhan, At Yellow Lake by Jane McLoughlin and Keren David's new book about Ty, called Another Life.
Those were the first two miracles in the fund raising. There were other miracles that followed. I am a novice at it. But what I learned, is people are so giving. If I but open my mouth, people, great people, are wiling to help. The Lord is very aware of this school, those with disabilities and very aware of those that can and are willing to help.
I'm not telling you this for naught. Please, please, please go see a dermatologist for a skin scan. Especially if you are in your 40s like me and have had bad sunburns (like I have) and have visited the dark, evil tanning bed (like I have, though not routinely because I don't have the patience to lay there).
Last week my community lost one its members. Suddenly. Unexpectedly.
● Relatively short project duration. I would require 24-36 months between the
So, before people start worrying about where my foie gras comes from, please spare a thought for your bacon, your Sunday roast and the milk you put on your breakfast cereal. Because I for one don't see much difference between force feeding a goose for a couple of weeks and keeping a chicken in a cage in which it can hardly turn around under artificial lights being fed crap for its whole sorry existence.
I've been one busy corgi.
I held you close, I held you tight,
Short Film (Documentary): Saving Face
I guess one way to try and get a bomb past a pat down at the airport is to put the explosive INSIDE the jihadi's body...you know, implant the bomb next to the guy's spleen. Well, that's apparently what al Qaeda is working on and counter-terrorism experts are concerned about it.
I belong to angels with battle-torn wings and voices raw from howling!
And in this movement, we discover the journey again. The beautiful journey. I have seen the sunrise through strange windows and the sunset on the playground. I have swum tens of thousands of meters in my own tears and been saved by lifeguards who just gave me a smile. I have ridden my singlespeed till my legs dropped off the electrical impulse map of my brain. You ask, “Are you still depressed?” I have to be honest and say…yes.
That he gets to work with deliveries, co-workers,
She will only do this for food. She won’t sit unless she knows I have a treat waiting for her. I don’t think she knows that when I say ‘sit’ that that means she should sit. All she knows is that when there is a treat in my hand, if she sits, she can get the treat. She is such a cat!
Jennifer Stob, Yale University
Released on Thanksgiving of 1983, A Christmas Story quickly came and went from most theaters with little fanfare. The film was released to very mixed reviews, most of them negative. I had graduated from High School that year and honestly don’t remember ever hearing a single word about the movie when it came out. I probably did not even see it for the first time until it made it onto HBO or came out on VHS.
In the past four months I’ve gone to various art galleries. I’ve seen Mesoamerican antiquities, aristocratic clothing through the ages, local artists, classic art work. I went to a wild life sanctuary where they take care of captive-bred animals that zoos don’t want. I went to the beach. In May, I’ll be going to a writer’s conference where I’ll be a speaker.
I plan to take it out for a test drive during tomorrow's run, so you know, tomorrow's Craft: along post might be interrupted with my cries for help and/or my farewells as I transport myself into a parallel universe by touching the bezel in an unapproved manner.
Thank you, all of you, past and present, for the past two years. You guys are part of something bigger than you could ever realize. You are all such an indelible part of my life, and have changed me in ways I never foresaw, that I can’t express my thanks enough. The past two years have been an amazing ride. Sometimes it was a breathless, uphill battle, but more often than not this has been fun. And challenging. And real.
Enjoy the piccies!:-
Excuse me?
Woohoo! Had some time last night to do a quick challenge. I really like the simplicity of the sketch that Karen put up for Sweet Sunday Sketch Challenge 143.
It will be interesting to see if the Senate follows through with its authority to ensure that the President abides by his Oath and determine whether President Obama did indeed violate his Constitutional limits and Oath. If so, then he must be Impeached.
Second bad thing of the Kpop is the fans. Being a quite impulsive fans once, I know the inside things of the fans. May some of you won’t believe there are quite some terrible things happening in the circle of being in a fans group. As this blog post may be read by someone who doesn’t know much about Kpop, I’ll break it down a bit. In Kpop, a singer or a group that has debuted and became known to public will usually have a fandom. Fandom is a fan base where the fans of the singers talk about them and share things like the photos, news, etc. Each singer/group will have a specific name for their fandom, for example SS501-Triple S; DBSK-Cassiopea; Big Bang – VIP; Wonder Girls – Wonderful; SNSD – Sone; Super Junior – E.L.F.; and so much more. The “strength of love” of the fans range from just enjoying their music and performance to a disturbing level. When you go deep into the fans group, you will see cyber wars here and there. There will be fans that are “protecting” their idols and those that they call “antis” which refer to anyone who hates their idols. They may rage war to those who says some critics or some things that are maybe a bit not nice against the idols.
If Pia and the twins get kicked off tonight, I'm going to be hacked off beyond belief. Jacob is the first to get the news and Seacrest leads him on before telling him that he's safe. Without a lot of fake drama, Seacrest tells us that Pia is leaving.
It wasn’t long before our food was presented. I chose the giant tempura prawn and white miso soup with silken sofu and confit abalone while he chose the smoked duck ravioli with curried pumpkin and carrot bisque for an entrée.
JYP recently released a mysterious teaser for the debut of JJ Project, and finally info has been released about the members.
1. Professional Distance
-3/4 cup white wine
Knowledge, as accumulated in the Internet and in books (as uploaded online through Google Books), has become hostage to Google’s interests: “the company’s role as mediator, filter, and editor of culture and information grows even stronger.”
So, I'm all kinds of excited!
This overwhelming Beauty-Love-Compassion-Bliss is the very nature, the essence, of the Brilliance that is Sat Chit Ananda; and its constant Outpouring is This ; all of this,
START YOUR OWN OCCUPY MOVEMENTS THIS IS FOR OUR FREEDOM OF SPEECH no one
The neighborhood had come alive within the short time Moody had been indoors. Some of her neighbors were in their yards gossiping with other neighbors or talking amongst themselves. Others were going about the business of normalcy by washing cars or playing basketball or simply sitting in deck chairs on the dry grass.
Edge Distresser: Tonic
1142 **D-VI/15/1992. “A Month with the Pope.” Rome Summer Program, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Rome Center, Rome, Italy. (Incorporated in Item C-1993(2), pp. 121-37.)
The closing, long story short, follows a legal dispute among heirs with various interests in the building at 27 Prince, which includes apartments and the two sides of Ray’s: the pizzeria and an Italian restaurant, each with its separate entrance, but sharing a kitchen and the corporation name, Ray’s of Prince Street. When the Ray in Ray’s, one of the owners of the building, died in 2008, a row arose over whether the restaurant’s lease was valid and whether it should pay rent. A lawsuit was filed in 2009 and settled this year.
A craving for these can’t be satisfied by anything else. So, we took matters into our own hands late Saturday morning and had a homemade banh mi brunch out on the lake.
Los Blancos take on Granada and Mallorca in their remaining two Liga games
A more innocent explanation is that Benji was influenced by what he saw on TV. Kangaroos are impressionable creatures, and I believe that re-runs of The Benny Hill show are popular in the Czech Republic. Who could blame Benji for mimicking the antics of a pie-faced buffoon who gets cheap laughs by ogling busty women? He simply wouldn’t have known any better.
We are, I fear, in for a bumpy ride. Many of us will not survive the trip. I believe it would be in our own best interest if we stopped falling for the "how large do we want government to be" false argument and instead focus on the real question at hand: what type of society do we want to live in? Forget the misleading rhetoric and get down to brass tacks. Are we ready to enter into a system of government which is designed to support an oligarchy? Because this is where we are swiftly heading.
Situated only 15 minutes from the Gare du Nord by train, it is a nice place to escape to even if you don’t set foot in the casino. However, the self-proclaimed ‘leading casino in France’ is clearly the chief attraction of the town, especially on this particular day! Further rules on casinos state that they must also offer a restaurant and other entertainment, so you may find more profitable ways to spend your time.
It should further be noted in this connection that, as Horowitz (1998) reminds us, the various European Socialist parties in World War I did not generally oppose the war in the name of international worker brotherhood but rather threw their support behind the various national governments of the countries in which they lived. Just as Mussolini did, they too nearly all became nationalists. Nationalist socialism is a very old phenomenon.
2 Praise the LORD, O my soul,
I've always been interested in WWII history. I was excited to hear there was a movie about the Tuskegee airmen. I must admit I found by accident whilst wandering around the internet. I am pretty much out of touch with current Pop Culture.
Still have a nice Sunday, I'll spend mine lazy with sleeping, reading and gaming.
Still full from the fried artichoke and potato chips from Johnny Garlic's, I was set on taking a looong dinner, so I could pace myself.
Thanks to everyone that played in our orange challenge. I am so ready for real fall weather to arrive. Here in Oklahoma we can still wear shorts and t-shirts.
The robust central governance continues to remain elusive to Afghanistan’s leaders. Entrenched local administrative procedures, based on authority from tribalism or local power brokers’ influence, continue to be resilient, while faith in the state is decreasing or is null.
Denise: I suffer from it on occasion. I deal with it by doing writing prompts. It’s the beginning of a sentence and then I let my mind go and see what comes. Guaranteed to work for me is a long drive to clear the cobwebs from my mind.
13. If you could have lunch with one notable (living) person who inspires you who would it be? Jennifer Lancaster would be so much fun, and since she’s a bit of a foodie, I know we’d eat well.
Under the influence of alcohol, it was disastrous. Challenged to undergo a 'vodka eyeball', she was determined to impress her friends.
So what have I been up to lately?
It knew the importance of a solid foundation, because it always remembered where it came from, how it had been protected and helped by the mud.
When you look at a movie like Super 8, the comparisons to Cloverfield are inevitable, especially seeing that Abrams is a master at hiding-the-monster film-making. This works on so many other levels, however (including that all-important nostalgia angle) that after a while you forget that this is a Spielberg homage and becomes something else altogether.
Today on a group call at work, we were answering what our favorite ice cream is in the world. I said frozen yogurt piled with things that make it bad for me. Apparently, that’s the mood I’m in!
Respondent’s asseveration that he waited for the complainant to provide him with details of the compromise agreement but the latter failed to come does not inspire belief in the face of the denials made by the complainant. Not even a piece of paper or letter requesting the complainant to provide him with the details of the agreement was presented to substantiate such allegation.
The origin of all this? the pagan festival of Samhain.
I'm not boasting about this, please know. For many years, Grandma was too far away to be able to help out the way I always dreamed it would be. And we had an awesome church family to rely on, a family who always came through for us. But in the back of my mind, I always imagined how it would be to have my mom close by, close enough to call on when I needed her.
3/4 cup red wine
Tolerate other people, remember that they are just as flawed as we are.
Watch for future posts, over the next few months, about repair adventures at the Commanderie which will include places to eat, what to cook, and how to cook it. Meanwhile, I'll leave you with this image of something we picked up in the covered 'Fois Gras et Truffles' Hall during our visit.
Is just equality in school
Jack Carter knew he was in trouble from the first moment he tried to open his eyes. At that instant, the very act of moving his eyelids was such a painful experience it rivaled the pain he once felt passing a kidney stone. Given the size of what he instinctively knew to be a massive hangover the early morning symphony of birds and other animals he usually enjoyed coming from the jungle outside his cottage became a tortuous amalgamation of sounds that felt like nuclear bombs going off inside his head. Even through his suffering a small segment of Jack’s mind appreciated the irony that he had originally moved to the small town of Alabama Wharf in the country of Belize in part to escape the insane clamor of daily life in New York City.
Although the infidels don’t have brotherhood, they are still united in their war against Islam. So what we need is to establish the brotherhood between theory and practice, and have this reformation. So when we talk about the brotherhood, it manifests on a global scale, meaning that when my brothers are bombed inside Iraq and Afghanistan, I stand up for them, and I say: “They are my brothers, they are my sisters, and I am with them.”
My overall conclusion.
